 

 

 

 

Abandoned Love Sonnet #4 

 
 
 
 
Damn. we’ve lost it. how does it go
again. the river: the light: then winter.
still river: still winter. over there:  dream 
here:  imagination  you: the space inbetween. 
 
 
and on the island we were horses. unbridled and 
No that was two poems ago.  to define  we  we hold 
hands. count clovers. two lucky clovers: two 
love sick horses running in the mayfields. then 
it was tuesday: eventually it wasn’t. 
 
 
any moveable object such as a cloud. or its insides 
or you and i is a terrible place to put trust into. 
 
 
 time is kind. says  heart attack : not                   .
describes the man as  complicated.  reminder: 
in lieu of flowers send donations to 
  


Kinda Sonnet #4

 

 
 
the painter sets down their brush.
says I’ve never felt so far away from language. 
not says but thinks it really really loudly. 
 
 
the cow makes a cow sound. if the crow crows it’s not a fable. 
the mountain lion lurks in its lover’s shadow. its has implications: 
sentience or lack thereof and such.  Such is life says the seer. 
 

 
a dream and a dream go on a blind date. Tell me about yourself. 
asks the dream politely as he looks into their dreamy eyes. 
I’m just tired of everyone  trying to shake  the meaning out of me. 
a silence. and then some time passes as they sip their 
drinks and talk about a variety of different topics etc. 
 
I feel woefully misunderstood. 
 
 



& Then #23
we come to your doorstep and we want to be clear: we mean this with the utmost disrespect
our backstory is unremarkable but clear: we walked five miles to renew our drivers license.
we got our usual sandwich from a different location and over the rush of yellow to red: the myth 
of orange: we admitted to ourselves that  We are going to be here for awhile longer  in the darkness 
the lantern becomes structural. we: the king of moths. many eyes dart towards our hands. 
now with this attention: we: the populators of fly over country would like to remind you 
that there is no  here  and  there  just more distance between strip malls and nonprofits
 


A cube who is growing. 
and growing unsure of himself.  #8
mid april: thirty five degrees. in the absence of clouds: 
the sun is showing even it has limits. two young lovers 
hold bare hands beside the lake: ignoring the logic of 
pockets. we’ve already shown our appreciation for pockets. 
holding everything we hold so dear that we must bring it 
along. didn’t know what to give them for a gift: yesterday’s 
dinner mints stinkying in the heat: a case study the limitations 
of objections/the space between object and the representative
thank you. it’s a thankless job. not unlike the jobs of all the other 
objectthings. the screams of the june grass/the farm cat 
who wished to never go inside. on the day that a mouth emerges 
from the vaseddaylily we will have a new language to learn.
i imagine  i’m sorry  &  thank you  will get all tangled up on our tongues. 



Recurrence 
in the absence of wind:  stillness of course.  
the slowness of the leaves is a reminder 
of the importance of scale. of time. scale 
of time. the stillness in the branches becomes 
a reminder of the limitations of  home.  a broken 
branch in a child’s hand becomes a sword or 
a magic wand  depending on the bedtime stories
where were we again?  the ever present loud 
i’ve said it before: it all starts in the eye.
ends with i. there is hope in shame. hope 
of change. right now. at this very moment: 



Abandoned Love Sonnet #11

 

 
 
 
 
we would like to thank you for coming. thank you for
your time. we are sorry that we could not accommodate 
all the dietary restrictions. we don’t mean to be inconsiderate. 
here is a sad equation coming to life. 
 
the river and the light and we are sorry. we apologize 
for the lack of object. we know we need the objects. 
we know our voice is followed by other voices 
could you repeat that please 
 
we know about past tense. that the quarters didn’t 
come out from our ears. and that the farm up north 
is a myth. but we can’t hear you. we: saving up for 
laundry day. 
 
once for nearly two years who only spoke in gratitude 
and apologies. this actually happened. not to say the rest 
of all of this did not. but we just want to remind you that 
there are no  committees  or  departments  just people wearing 
different hats in meetings and  checking to see if an e signature will suffice 
 
 
 


 

Abandoned Love Sonnet #12

 

 

 
 
a while back we said we were horses. we didn’t mean it 
poetically. just. in the way that it’s been a really long time 
since we’ve remembered our names. 
 
 
form: arbitrary. beams: nonstructural. a reminder: 
a medium amount of system failures are shrugged 
off as we  collectively ignore. cheat gravity. on our way 
to tucson. 
 
online many people talking about the myth of gravity. 
instructs. instructions: see the field and its flatness. for 
a moment imagine the exponential expansion of lack 
of curvature. we too many papers to grade. we log off 
we have too many other things to be faithful to.
we still finding the right thing to be faithful to.  you too
 
we names: instructive: a gun means attention. we say. 
we says  alright alright we’ll have it by tomorrow. relax 



Act Three/Sonnet #42
Of course there’s a sun bear in birmingham that knows 
about mars. but everyone seems really happy and he 
is good at keeping secrets. today the sun bear is searching 
for land. there’s a marble in his pocket. since this is a poem 
we get to know this marble is  earth  and that the bear 
works as a public relations director for the sun bear 
space program. this sun bear knows that visuals are more
effective than words alone. it is difficult to find seven 
square miles of open land. sun bears keep secrets from 
each other. it’s for the best we’re told. yes from a far enough
distance the sun bear world is small but it’s best if we don’t think 
about that. the sun bears come home and kiss each other. then. 
back to their possibly fulfilling jobs in the morning. all at once this happens 
on the sun bear plant. many times over. the sun bears eventually fall asleep.



Act Three/Sonnet +1  #36
Sure fine.
i want the sun bear to be happy too.
the days are always the same amount of too long 
and there is either too much to do or what there is
is not exciting. but of course he’s happy to return 
to his cubs watch the game and have something 
to talk about. when the cubs win the world series
it’s a great story. cubs grow up because that’s what
they do. you shouldn’t look into that still river. the moon
will be here soon. if the air doesn’t feel like being windy
the sun bear can see himself in the still river. or. he could
return home and use his closet mirror. all the advancements
are too helpful and present to be noticed. the sun bear’s
neck ties are all the wrong shade of green. turn the lights 
back off. can’t you see the sun bear’s wife is trying to sleep 


Act Three/Sonnet #37 
Okay you got me. i cheated. the last poem was
too long.i didn’t think you were paying attention. i am
glad you're paying attention. isn’t that what we both want.
the sun bear reads books on bear traps so he can feel 
empowered. the trap expert paid the ghost writer
because he likes to be listened to but isn’t good with
words. and the ghost writer is on a plane to malaysia. 
the sun bear isn’t sure what the opposite of
a zero sum game is. he hasn’t read the theory. yet.
he still believes in the good of it all. he plants
the seeds and waits till spring. see there’s been 
star fruits all along. why bother convincing
the sun bear of anything else. there’s a cub being born 
in the san diego zoo today. we do not choose the definition of home. 



Trust Poem

 

 
 
it’s the first friday of the month; when city tests 
the tornado sirens.  necessary and loud. 
been doing this for decades.  but not forever. not always. 
 
forgotten trust; turning our backs at the atm: 
handing our phones over to a stranger to take 
a photo of us next to the world’s largest ball of yarn. 
Look. Look, we look so small! 
 
when we run out of movies to watch on the rainiest day 
we can make a list of could be disasters.
 
the scientist in palo alto had a bad night’s sleep. 
spliced the wrong genes. 
 
the cloned megalodon grew legs.   
 
the geese mistook the plane’s engine for a home. 
 
was the plane in the air. were we in the plane. who 
was in the plane. 
 
Fire escapes. 



Contemporary Poem  #3

 
 
here is a suitcase. a fistful of travelers checks. 
and. the map from the cell phone commercial
that shows the parts of the land that they haven’t 
gotten to yet: Happy long weekend. responsibilities
make joy seem selfish. turn the tv off. breaking news 
could make joy feel selfish. like. at the rest stop 
you see an empty fast food bag blowing in the wind.
it’s not yours. but. in a way. you’re its last remaining hope.
 
 
because batteries die: your phone is off. because 
you want to show everyone you made a pitstop 
to see The World’s Biggest Ball of Yarn  you buy
the tshirt that says Welcome to Cawker City Kansas 
Home of the…  because he couldn’t take the time off
work. because mail is slow and postcards get 
lost: you buy him a pocket sized souvenir. upon 
returning home: handing it to Jakob: both of you
silently knowing: a while back i was missing you so dearly. 
 
. 



& Then #17
the sound the ground and then finally its object. once there was a person 
in cave: shadows assumed. once we fell in love. not with each other but 
with ourselves. once we went to the town with no love poems and 
read them our love poems. we become the kings of joy. we the kings: 
of joy. it’s selfish but we are  Doing good work  eventually they grow tired of 
We  we pack up our things and cut our losses. we go home and take 
jobs at the factory where they cut up the hacked up trees. the press 
secretary says something about  Governmental subsidies  &  Job creation 



Metrology Theory #5
ignoring possibilities. like. the memory of water. 
like. how this glass of water was once in the stomach 
of the very last wooly mammoth,
on his last day. he thought  the sky is melting fire  or. 
all the mountains are crumbling  but. hopefully in reality 
nothing at all. hopefully. he wasn’t the very last one. 
but.  one of   hopefully all his mammoth friends were 
there too. since it was the end in every elsewhere. 
normal day/disaster/together.  not at all. then. 
all at once. like. how when we need it. we tell eachother 
the story of how we met. the lake. the light. ignoring
the thousands of minions at our feet. ignoring the end 
of august. i don’t remember the sound of the waves. 
but. i know you and i were there.  
 Thesis Proof #4 
importance is contextual. like. the mountain climber tramples 
on countless undiscovered plants on his way to the summit 
each day and does not realize it. or. while driving our dog 
to the dog park we drive by a dead deer on the side of the road. 
and say  that’s a shame.  and. make a pitstop at the gas station because 
we forgot our dog’s water bowl. or. one could argue that this 
is an argument over the impact of giving a something a name. 
a thesis in a database means the argument has been given 
some time and thought. the greatest risk while climbing to the 
summit is tripping over other climbers. so request off work 
on a wednesday. gathering around the water cooler 
to talk about weekend plans is cliche. but. is also happening 
in many offices at this very moment. also many people are asleep b/c
in elsewhere it is also night. or. will be night eventually. both are true. 



Broken Sonnet #14
 
 
Because the sun bear is a mammal 
he has learned to ignore the people 
or the lack of people watching 
or not watching him. there are probably 
many photos of him online in albums 
with titles such as day at the zoo or 
weekend in san diego to the sun bear
there are no house guests. or. fan clubs. 
the sun is there i guess
 
 
the two people trying to find common ground watching the sun bear 
eat star fruit call it a first date. the sun bear would be disappointed 
if he knew that it was saturday and he had nothing special to occupy 
his weekend. lucky lack of sentience. he the bear. ignorance is bliss 
we know. a child gets his pacifier. the bear can enjoy his meal in peace. 
 
 
  


Broken Sonnet #15
 
 
Before the dial bear and tea jar 
there had to be a sun. then time. 
then we needed a reason for the sun. 
sun god. solar science and so on.
the sun is good. we need the sun.
it is cold on all the planets we claim
are lifeless. we honor the sun. we like
the bear because he is small and seemingly
harmless. hence the patch on his chest 
 
 
the sun. we made you the boss. gave you our bear please 
never stop exploding and giving us warmth. i know it must look miserable here
from up there. sun bears fighting other sun bears. sun bears going hungry 
while others cheat the numbers. give us time to work this all out. we the 
sun bears need to believe that it all means something more. 



Narrative Studies #3
The river eats the light. The light catches the moths. I meant vanish. I meanted 
the opposite of vanish. There are limitations to words. Limitations to the knowledge of. 
See: the end of every argument. This is why we turn down the television’s volume when
our favorite characters are at the part of the story where they just haven’t quite realized 
that they are still in love. I want to make a list of every word I know and test the limitations
of algorithms. I want to string the words together and hear the applause after my orchestra. 
we use metaphors to compare something we don’t understand with something we know. 
like at the investment seminar the man displays the wealth gap using piles of rice. We are here, 
to his left: small pile, with enough to feed us, maybe save up to trade for a nice car every 
decade or two. But as we go right, the piles get bigger and bigger until we see the man 
again standing on top of the tallest pile. He says  I was once over there too.  pause.  I was once 
you! But you can join me too!  and now this is the part of the story where we realize that we 
are living in the warnings. That  investment  meant  sales pitch.  That  Time shares  is in the fine 
print. When the words are done dancing across the page that they can not/will not
return unchanged. But the man is well dressed. The man speaks well. Well the winters 
are cold here. The white sand between our feet. Blue drinks in hand as the sun 
glimmers against our glasses. Ignoring the way the sun has aged all our faces. 
At the end of logic this is where we will be. 
  


an ode/elegy that starts out being about my dog then my grandma but really was about me the whole time 
i am thankful for that every letter has a sound. for congregation. 
for gathering. and. agreed understanding. when i say  my dog died 
you think of your dog. and the limits of time.  how he /she died  
too. and. we share our individual samesadness.   in my arms. after 
one year of cancer.   (oh no my voice is cracking.) 
i want to know what happens after language fails.
i wish  he was my best friend  wasn’t such a cliche. and.  but really.  had more meaning. 
that i was younger and could believe in “the farm up north”. and. that 
my mother did not have to feel so sad when she saw me cry. and wiping 
the tears off Taffy’s stiffening body. 
My grandmother died that same fall.
My mother, her caretaker, for the last decade. 
Overtime the legs stopped working. then arms. overtime 
is slow. like how the leaves do not fall all at once. that would be absurd.
like. a  what is this hospital bed doing in the living room. 
we tie up  the end  for comfort. laces in shoes. or. dog heaven. 
the way we gather the words to remind us of joy. like how, once 
my grandmother could no longer speak, mom translated a dictionary 
of sounds. one for  I love you  & another for  Thank you.    

it was early october. or i can’t really remember. 
mom walked into grandma’s room and said something about  heaven . 
something about being in a  better plac e. something about losing 
a mother. and 
losing a friend too. 
she cried. and. i cried watching her cry. 
 
one day I will be my mother.  


Bad Patriot Poem 
sun bears are the smallest bear species 
the 2nd smallest bear species is
not the moon bear although they are 
relatively small when compared 
to other bears such as polar bears 
if left alone most dog breeds would 
die off and the ones remaining would
adapt through natural selection 
to survive in the wild like wolves 
the new variety of poodle will be 
smaller but also have warmer legs 
because humans will be gone 
and their fur will not be shaved 
for aesthetic reasons 
this morning i woke up in iowa city 
in seoul my brothers who i may 
or may not have are getting ready 
for bed no one here looks like 
me everyone looks at me hi 
hello i say i’m trying my best 
to be american no one here thinks 
i can be an american 
  


Inevitability Study 
Progression is inevitable: too tall trees over time means longer necks or upright mobility. 
When the first railroad was being installed the news papers were filled with headlines like 
Breakneck speeds  &  What about the steamboat workers?  The world’s richest man says he will stop 
world hunger if the correct organizations can prove they can end world hunger. For now, 
I am practicing small scale,  local asian owned businesses.  It’s a shame that it feels good 
to do kind deeds, selfishly I want to know what parts I’m doing for me. 



Affirmation Circle 
trust the ring of the clock tower: it’s been right along. 
ignore that one day every four years when we realize we’ve 
gotten so far off track that we say  alright. alright. fine 
one more day of winter.   it’s so easy to get off track. a while 
back someone asked  how would you like to spend the rest 
of your days?   and the boy said  words  meant  look at me! 
meant something about taking the wonder out of all 
the limal spaces like seeing the humming bird’s wings. 
could’ve said  afraid  and something about  the real world
here is a book on the subjectivity of time and 
here is a bird: find truth. create an argument about 
the absolute absence of absolute truth: the many 
truths that are existing right here. and now. all at once:
Jakob, you are in ohio and i am in notohio and all 
the love poems have already had their truth shaken out. 


Love language. i mean. a poem about love and language. 
midnight phone call: love or death 
of course. what else? she says the story 
always goes like this: we will fall in love/
be in love. then. one day. not all at once. 
but slowly over time. we won’t. all this 
will ruin you. not like gray clouds on 
the morning of the science fair. more 
like the therapist redirecting your thoughts 
to things like  healthy routines  &  how did that 
big presentation go at work. 
language is slippery. means i take a long 
walk instead of x or y. see three geese.
open my computer  three geese  and over
the phone tonight tell you  i was doing 
some prewriting  means one of my students 
is shows me a news article on immigration
illegal immigrants… (i)   stop them right there 
and say  this is exactly what this is going to say 
and they think i can read minds. later 
the evals read:  he’s obviously well read…but  


After the joy of the grad school acceptance email dissipates. Or : on dread 

 
night class  means wonder. means future paybump.
or the spring acceptance letter means  i’ll see you next decade. 
it’s selfish to pack up all your dinner plates and say 
I’ll be back before you know it!  tonight i’m feeling sentimental. 
i want to believe that geese fall in love once & forever. 
but that isn’t interesting. that won’t last. in class they ask 
us to smash the keyboard. to reach in to a bag of letter 
and hand  them truth . and then  prove it! 
my thesis is this: there are no new ways to talk about the stars. 
many smarter people have taken the wonder out of the stars. 
outside my window an undergrad screams  this is the best night of my life!
which is neither here nor there. but shows us that someone 
is feeling joyful. that the possibility of joy is so near. 
but i already said that wasn’t here. 


Half Sonnets/Full Portraits #5 
to measure absence we measure the air around whatever 
object we are measuring. like when measuring the weight of 
the elephant in san diego we find less air in the swimming 
pool after the elephant steps in. oh whoops. the elephant 
is sorry for getting your shoes wet. he would be much more 
popular if he was a vibrant color. think navy blue. everyone 
looks good in navy blue. is what i am thinking to myself 
after you text back  you look good today  in response to my outfit
oftheday text. maybe i do look good in this work shirt. we 
really need to find jobs in the same city. if i text you and 
say  it’s raining here today.  you would already know that. because 
we are too far away to drive to, but. close enough that the 
clouds have the same mood. sometimes we meet in toledo. 
and i’ve always wanted to say something sappy about 
how. only then. only here. with you. does it feel like home. 
but night is reliable and we both have long drives ahead 
of us in separate directions. i am thankful for cell towers. 
the young love birds’ pigeon is thankful for cell towers.  


 

Half Sonnets/Full Portraits #3

 
 
 
these bare branches give us something to look forward to. 
stillwhite. still & white. long ago the scratch offs become 
more about the ritual than the hope of it all. with the winnings 
we buy more tickets. with the quarters we do our laundry. 
elsewhere someone is dreaming bigger. has all the right lucky 
numbers. has a new name picked out. knows to take the lump sum. 
and all that jazz. we plan a trip to north dakota. we lost our 
cameras in montana. someone’s child in montana is becoming 
a photographer:
 
god damn it’s wonderful to be in love. we pack 
the movie theater seats to watch the story of the penguins. how 
one leaves to fish while the other warms the egg. how the egg 
warmers take turns warming each others’ eggs as they all dream 
of fish. please ignore the sentience of the fish.  watching the 
penguins huddle together in the tundra on the screen makes 
us cold. we feel cold. sharing this feeling gives us something 
to have in common. you and i together sipping root tea. 
become warm together. it doesn’t have to end.  


A war poem where we are defectors 

 
If you want we could stay. Steal sheep and make sweaters from mangled wool. 
It could be warm for us. Don’t you want to be warm? Desperation yields advancement. 
The calf we stole from the rauncher four houses down, we didn’t know what to feed it,
before it could feed us. Correction: desperation minimizes risk. Three glass bottles of milk thickening to spoil on our countertops. When hunger logic settles in it doesn’t like to leave. Remember? We use to sleep with butter knifes in our pillowcases, waiting for bread
or waiting for war. 
Dad’s fists never needed reloading.
And we were always wearing the wrong color.



Every March 
the lake untroubles. 
the geese again become gods of the lake. 
a boy points out towards the water and says
goose!  the mother smiles and ignores 
monday. eventually the child will have a lifetime 
of ignoring mondays. we gave god/God/
gods/Gods the morning. and. gave the geese 
our waffle cones when we were done. and. 
unfinished. or.  the character actor busily alone 
outside of culver city who does not know his career 
has been over for the last ten years.
daylight on the lily pads. joy. 
for now. then. goose/monday/geese/mondays. 
can someone tell jakob when it is the last time 
he will hug his mother. 



Act Three Sonnet #41
The sun bear has enough star fruit to open a planetarium. 
so he does. the fruit on the ceiling is meant to look like stars
of course.  the planets?  well that’s us. silly. sun bears do not yet
have knowledge of other planets. thus are under the impression 
that they are indeed the center. that the sun explodes for them. 
this makes whatever the sun bears do feel important. like pioneers 
of this whole living deal. it’s great for a while. a sun bear in iowa city 
is learning how to preserve star fruits in vinegar. as if this will go on forever. 
it's binary. either the sun bears are alone or they are not. the answer matters. 
many sun bears could be employed in a new division of the space program. 
they would spend their days on the logistics of sending a message into space 
while other sun bears tried to come up with a message. the sun bears would 
become frustrated with the constraints of language. but a sun bear waving 
doesn’t have to mean hello.



Grad school boy/sunk cost 

It’s astonishing to think of how far I would go
for money. For example, if you and I were 
to move Busan, and open a old school malt shop 
people would be whispering  naive ,
but if I were to move to New York to work 
in that publishing house that rhymes with 
Penguin people would use words like  motivated
or  has things going for him.  Most of my old friends 
talk about college in past tense, 
and it’s really hard to explain what 
a workshop is and why it is productive. 
My grandfather took a trip to the redwoods 
and sent me a photo of tree bark and said, 
“I made it!”. I texted back “that’s just a tree” 
and then he called me, and I listened to birds 
chirping as he reassured me of his location 
and my life choices.  


Memory Sequence 
i hope i do not become too fond of this elephant, 
or/and he does not become too fond of me. because 
apartments are small, and that cliche about memory 
has been true enough times to become a cliche. 


we find an old radio half buried in the yard. besides
the birds, the children at play, and the screams 
of grass being shortened: it is silent, because batteries 
die over time. i’m being dramatic. no one buries batteries. 
two towns over at the junkyard seagulls are playing
king of the hill.
the radio is tuned to a station playing oldies music. 
it is probably a different radio station, but could be 
playing the same song that was playing when the radio 
died. he could be that famous radio that cusack held 
above his head outside the window.  oh, hi mr. radio, 
sir. it is an honor to meet you. sorry, i’m not dressed 
for the occasion. what are you doing in town?
the elephant keeper sees the circus as a job. a peanut 
is a tool, the elephant is a coworker, and so on. 
some grocery stores play pop music, others play 
acoustic versions. think about it. there is always music 
playing at the store.  


Half Sonnets/Full Portraits #5
to measure absence we measure the air around whatever 
object we are measuring. like when measuring the weight of 
the elephant in san diego we find less air in the swimming 
pool after the elephant steps in. oh whoops. the elephant 
is sorry for getting your shoes wet. he would be much more 
popular if he was a vibrant color. think navy blue. everyone 
looks good in navy blue. is what i am thinking to myself 
after you text back  you look good today  in response to my outfit
oftheday text. maybe i do look good in this work shirt. we 
really need to find jobs in the same city. if i text you and 
say  it’s raining here today.  you would already know that. because 
we are too far away to drive to, but. close enough that the 
clouds have the same mood. sometimes we meet in toledo. 
and i’ve always wanted to say something sappy about 
how. only then. only here. with you. does it feel like home. 
but night is reliable and we both have long drives ahead 
of us in separate directions. i am thankful for cell towers. 
the young love birds’ pigeon is thankful for cell towers. 
 



Narrative Studies #7
With long lines we expect narrative. We expect to wait.  We expect action to happen,
and with each lick of the thumb, to be closer to resolution.  Limited interjections please.  All the seniors 
who want to study prelaw expect to be in the courtroom, to have that one great moment 
where they can shoot up from their seat and say  but wait your honor! May I bring you attention 
to!  But really, just like everyone else: more paperwork and forms.  Forms  have correct answers. 
Name here, number of tax withholding there.  Form  has expectations: the prayers end in amen, 
the sonnets tie up the bow. When reading the theory textbook it’s easy to forget that he is guessing, 
making the best guesses from a collection of other guesses. He went to school for a very 
long time to cut up the words and stitch them back together. This doesn’t pay very well, 
no one cares too much about this. Trust me. The scientist already has names for the next 
twenty undiscovered elements that are yet to be found. 

Ars Academia #2 

 

 

 
the sun bear is half way through grad school where he 
spends his days studying the history of sun bear art 
and teaching younger sun bears how to compose their 
speech in a way other sun bears will better understand 
today the sun bear feels bored and some other emotions 
which combine together to make him realize 
that his future job prospects are bleak
 
 
he has accepted the fact that between the hours of 95 
for next 5 ish decades his life will be mundane at its 
best points and dreadful and its worst between working 
hours there will not be too much in between states 
of emotion but to the sun bear this feels like the 
better alternative than working on projects that will 
go nowhere that no one will care about or read 
and not having enough money to buy genetically 
modified crickets 
 
the sun bears smashes his paws against the keyboard 
and writes half a dozen cover letters for jobs that he 
does not have the qualifications for and the letters 
are hazard because his keyboard is small and his 
paws lack the tactility needed to properly communicate 
with sun bears he does not know 
 
 
despite the fact that his current home is small 
and cage like  far away from his birth country
he is a happy sun bear who is well fed
with organic honey and has well trimmed nails  
 
we should not spend too much time worrying 

about the sun bear secretly hopes his current life will work out  


Ars Academia #2

 

 

 
there are too many sun bears studying 
to become masters and/or doctors of sun bear studies 
this is something we all know
but would rather not talk about 
 
there are people in the sun bear academy’s 
career services department whose sole 
job is to remind the sun bears of this 
so that the academy will have plausible deniability
when the newly doctored sun bears have nowhere 
to submit their CVs to  
 
about 30% of these well educated sun bears 
will get the privilege to teach other sun bears 
about sun bears studies between a variety 
of other administrative tasks they will 
or will not write interesting new things 
about their niche field of study that other 
sun bears who are in their department 
will skim and say that’s interesting 
 
for the “less fortunate” sun bears whose work 
does not fit the current treads of the top 
scholarly journals and the various needs 
of academic departments their years of study 
will implicitly and subconsciously shape 
their mentality as the sun bears sell cars 
market natural sleeping pill alternatives 
to doctors copy editing texts books 
or other chosen career paths  


Alone Poem
i know all your tricks you’ve drenched my undershirt
in my sweat yesterday 
i read that a fever is actually a good thing 
meaning that my body is fighting something 
off so i’m skinbare for you my dear 
do you like what you see? Tonight the woman i love called me 
to say she’s starting to love me 
less so it’s just you 
and i tonight i refuse to please 
us the crickets hiding in the floor
boards are as loud as snare drums i can’t see 
you in this dim lit room soon you’ll notice 
my discomfort and ask if i want to step 
outside for a smoke i’ll nod yes more for 
the company than anything else



Reverse Circular Reasoning/Relapse Desire #3 (body mind) 
Proof: 
Dormant addicts withholding their pleasures. 
Hold your applause. 
The prize for this begoodsuffering?
To die sober. To have that last breath be full 
of want. 
II
I return to land: pond weeds latched onto the crest
of my ankle bones, shoes heavy, 
black socks thick with cloudy water. 
When you say  home  I think of leaping out 
of paleness. I think of falling asleep, 
safe from sad news: dying grandmothers, 
greying corals or chalking flint against steel 
over an already burning succulent harmless. 
I 
Last night I fed pond fish all my white pills 
and was immediately overwhelmed with joy. 
For a moment I thought I’d never have  
to be home. 
Thesis:
The mind floats 
in the body. 
The body is stapled 
to the earth.
I, We, born into a world 
that’s always been on fire.  


It doesn’t matter now 
the magic of the birdseed. 
How you kept the squirrels from thieving 
while the maple leaves crisped. The secret 
you kept while the snow 
pears coated in ice like jewels. And now 
like always: spring again. A sapling with feathers 
instead of branches announces itself outside 
our bedroom window as its feathers luviate 
to the ground. But then night. And strong wind 
or a large creature who snapped its wings 
and dragged them away for warmth or a home. 
We’ll come back to feathers on the ground 
and think the birds flew away 



Complete/Separate #9
For a long time it was cold. a perfect environment 
for polar bears. the polar bears thrived. ate the seals 
injured the polar bears wrote the laws and texts 
and chose which ones were “worth keeping”. today 
it is warm and there are many star fruits growing. 
yet the sun bear is still perceived as a weaker bear 
not because of their small bodies or lack of applicable 
skills. in the trees young sun bears are learning bear history.
their books’ are water damaged from snow
the sun bears at the university too. there are many sun bears right now 
in lecture halls listening to lectures about sun bear theory. some sun bears 
will go to school for a long time then write their own sun bear theory. 
others will graduate and subconsciously take this acquired knowledge 
into the workplace. thankful they need to put more seats in the lecture hall. 



“Sun Bear Studies” Seminar 
ten sun bears sit around a large circle table 
all holding copies of the same textbook 
the lead sun bear (whom all the other sun bears 
hope to one day become) is running late 
because their staff meeting went long 
and they had many emails to reply to 
the sun bears begin to discuss the text 
which was written by a sun bear 
from another academic institution 
the thesis of the book is something 
about how the history of sun bears 
is often ignored because other species 
of bears are more powerful and thus 
hold positions of power and overtime 
get to choose which species of bears’ 
history gets to be told/remembered 
we all agree the book should be lauded 
for its creativity and willingness to question 
the social norms of history 
the lead sun bear walks into the room 
carrying iced coffee, bear claws and a 
variety of other pastries 
he or she says 
Sorry I’m late. One of my undergraduate sunbears 
was having trouble submitting their term paper online. 
the eleven sun bears spend the next half hour 
or so eating the pastries and talking about 
the clunkiness of virtual classroom spaces 
rising rent prices lack of institutional support 
and other daily living hazards 


A love poem/citizenship test 
the roses are red it is night 
the street lights are reliable 
your phone declares there 
is a high chance of rain 
it is a good night to call 
anyone and say  I’ve loved you 
for a while now 
	but you know none of this
no windows to tell you you’ve already
missed the day for a long time now 
you haven’t spoke outside of your needs 
phone calls to doctors or  three
when the cashier asks you 
how many bear claws are in the bag 
this is why dreams are harmful 
Really, listen. how many time have your
teeth fell out yet you woke and ate
sugared flakes 
for a long time i was awake 
trying to become an american 
telling myself it would be good 
here if i was an american 
over the phone you use to quiz me 
what caused the civil war 
	 human rights! 
well yes, but no that’s not the answer they want 



Unlikeable Sonnet 
[we like the sonnet. it keeps its promises. 
first we are a sad sun bear in the forest. 
of course the star fruits laying on the bear 
trap are tempting. you are a sun bear and traps 
do their jobs. you are stuck here now. enjoy 
the fruit. don’t worry you’ll be saved. the 
bile in your liver has value and poems 
have form for a reason. we want to know
what happens to the paw if he was left alone. 
sorry.] 



Ars Poetica #97/Affirmations #5 

 
you will not win the yale younger 
because your manuscript was rushed 
and there are many poets who write 
more life affirming poems than you 
ones thats are just familiar enough 
to resonate but also place the reader 
in a pleasant amount of discomforting 
rumination that makes them say 
fuck tomoorrow I will buy a metal straw 
recently the age limit was lifted from the yale younger  
but i would need 10x the amount of lifetimes 
to write enough poems that can logically be put in 
conversation with each other to be considered a collection 
and humans do not live that long and poetic tastes change
over generations 
whoever wins the yale younger will have a slightly easier 
time obtaining employment as a tenure track professor 
jakob from workshop now sells mortgages 
and posts his poems on facebook they get 
a fair amount of likes and a number of people 
from our workshop comment about how they like 
the combination of adjectives and nouns 
tonight at softball he yelled  the housing market is booming 
from left field as i got caught stealing second
i asked if any pro scouts were presented 
jakob left the game early 
because he and his wife 
had to go to a wedding 
the next morning   
i stayed for the double header 
to get my batting average above 300 
no one important was at the game 
i could still go pro  
 Softball Team 
It’s getting late. We should probably 
call it. I should probably call you 
to say, I’ll be home later than I thought. 
The field lights have been on 
for a while now and the ball is disappearing 
when thrown from third to first. 
I will not go out for beers tonight 
because I forgot a change of clothes, 
and I do not want to talk about mutual 
funds after hours and I do not have 
many common interests 
with my coworkers beyond our trite 
dislike for our boss. Before Geoff 
was our boss, he was our star shortstop,
because he had a killer pick off move, 
and had a gravitational personality 
and gave really good pregames/
seventh inner rally speeches, 
which is probably also why 
he got promoted to be our boss. 
I have led the company in all 
important numbers: new clients, 
returning clients yearly returns, 
and RBI, but I am kinda shy 
and lack the personal skills 
needed to interview well, and socialize
outside of the workplace. Which is also 
why I am calling you to say 
I’ll be home soon.  
 Winter Ode 
This plane’s wing 
looks like a child’s drawing 
of a plane’s wing. 
While getting ready
to wait 
to get to our destination 
we are being told 
what to do 
in case of an emergency 
so that we will be prepared 
if there is a river
under the plane. 
I do not want my body 
to be found 
in a life jacket. 
Like the dentist 
telling you 
that your bleeding gums 
will lead 
to losing teeth:
 
no one is listening.
In the best case 
scenario there is a river 
under the plane. 
We should not fly 
from Tucson to Detroit
in December 
because the river 
is sleeping. 
Not sleeping
like sun bears 
or frog hearts 
more like the trust 
I’ve put in you.  


What we leave you with 
May it rain as the suited men lower our coffins into the ground 
so when people drive by the funeral guests will look 
the appropriate level of sad. 
May the funeral not draw a large crowd 
because then we’ll know we lived long enough. 
May our children smell like us 
so our forgetful dogs can be content 
with their new owners. 
When the kilted men play their bagpipes 
may you think of us on our graduation day 
when we were young in both direction 
and just like now: thinking of 
nothing at all.  


Act 3/Sonnet #39
There.
i gave you back a line after writing one too many.
i compared the sun bear to something you knew so you
could get delight in a new layer of a thing you already know.
you feels a little too hostile. Harm means permanent. the dictionary
says this. we have to trust someone. earlier we had a talk about
the sun bear having too much trust in the trees. today is the present.
we need the chairs so the forest is gone. our sun bear is there. his cubs
will overtime lose strength in their limbs. the story is still developing.
when the sun bear fell off the tree only you and i were there. we are
developing the story. fell is that what we are going with. the sun bear. or .
the tree? overtime the sun bear’s body will help grow many trees is what
we are telling each other. the sun bear returns home from war to many
thank yous. or. his mother will quickly hate the word hero.



Act Three/Sonnet 47
It wasn’t a gun so the sun bear doesn’t have to mention
it again. those are the terms someone else’s father
agreed to. may no one ever have to call your emergency
contact on your behalf. can you trust the sun bear?
could you trust the sun bear? you can trust the sun
but bears are still bears. don’t worry i’ve heard this argument
before. two alone sun bears fall in love so they aren’t too lonely.
turn the television on there’s important news after the ninth inning.
to get attention you say the world is bad or the world is going to be bad if
we don’t… the sun bears on the television provide this call to action
every night. a starfruit donated to the food pantry out of guilt still
tastes like a star fruit. tonight a sun bear that i trust said the world
is going to end in a decade or two. the baseball playing sun bears
still show up at the ballpark. it smells like spring. yes. spring!



The day after we got fake IDs 
Heavy rain. Little Boat,
I’m sorry we won’t make it 
to the place where it’s ocean
in every direction. Behind us,
for now, there is land, 
and light, and its people 
who we are leaving behind,
do not realize they are ignoring 
the wind which is loosing nails 
from the shingles. In one house 
a mother is convincing her child 
that he is tired, and elsewhere
no one waits for a red stoplight. 



Early Summer/Jeff Poem 
The figs have ungreened and there’s a book 
about reeds on your bookshelf waiting for
December to be read. Oboes need double
reeds and a willing mouth to make sound, 
and in June water beetles rest of reeds 
and make beetle sounds by clicking
together their hard beetle wings because 
summer is mating season: thus a stricter 
need for attention. Again, summer came
before my body was ready for attention, 
of course it was warm and Michigan 
was still surrounded by its five lakes, 
I ate small fruits and the sand was invisible 
I met a man, whose name, like mine, 
was also Geoff.  
 The horse who licks mothballs and swallows rusty nails
Don’t worry, 
the garbage bag in
his stomach is keeping
him safe. Listen, 
do you know how hard 
it is to use the otherside 
of a hammer? Useless things:
rubber nails, your self portrait 
etched in white sand, a straw bed
at noon. If papers with nail holes 
are blowing in the wind 
and the telephone poles 
are bare something  missing 
is becoming  lost.  
The brindle soaked 
in apple vinegar. The lead 
tied down to nothing. 
There’s no one left to 
stop me from thinking 
run.  No one to say 
the better end of 
forgive me.  I’m sorry 
you stumbled 
into this mind. 


Dream Logic 
Typical story: alone on an island. New twist: whatever you dream 
will come to life. Wanting company or to dare even  leave  the stagnant sand
you tell yourself to dream of something useful: and the next morning 
you wake to seven flares. For a week you shoot flares into the air,
no one comes. But each morning you wake to a new delight: 
Monday, a bed to sleep in, Tuesday green bananas, Friday a pillow.
By Saturday already ripe avocados, welcome you to the day. As expected
you are getting arrogant, lonely and want home. Arrogant, godlike, 
with that filthypride, no crowd to applaud. You want to go home. 
So tell yourself to dream of a sailboat and strong winds. Almost home!
You wake and there’s a horse mistaking your hair for alfalfa, mistaking 
you for his owner, and you know nothing about horses. 
So you dream that you’ve already read through the encyclopedia
labeled  H   and have learned horses don’t really like saddles, don’t really 
need apple water soaked brindles to keep them content. Instead 
you dream of a water trough and fertile soil, to replace the sand. The horse 
sleeps open eyed and standing up, but you already know this has something
to do with fear. New day, no water clinking into the tin. New day, and the 
grass seeds, stay seeds. He looks at you looking at him and both you of know
this is no place for a horse. The next day you wake and the horse is gone.
Assume your dreams were filled with horse eating creatures. The kind with teeth
that can rip through strong thigh muscles. Maybe wolves, maybe furless tigersit doesn’t matter. 
He’s not coming back. Or you dreamed of a field with tall grass and wildflowers 
in a place where it’s always April. You dreamed of other horses, then you dreamed him there.  


The Good Kind of Boring  
If you’re reading a book 
& the animals talk, it’s a fable. If you’re walking to work 
& the neighbor's dog barks, it’s Monday. Today at the lake 
the ducks thanked me for my bread crust by asking for more. 
Lunch break was over i left the park but the ducks followed 
me to the office, & waited outside of the door, as i stared 
at the screen & moved imaginary numbers from there to 
there. Once work was over i walked home & the ducks 
forgot all about the lake. In the front yard i ate more bread 
& they ate more crust but needed water. In the bathtub  
i got clean & they waited to swim. Then they slicked their 
feathers & i went to bed. 
It was silent as always. 



Rebellion Metaphor 
I want to create an abstract art piece
with no meaning and have it on display 
at the Broad. I’ll call it “Anything Besides
Nothing” it will be a blank 
grey canvas with a grey frame,
or the opposite of that.
People will wait in line in the hot sun 
to come and stare at my art for 
a really long time 
to try to figure out what it means. 
They won’t have any idea
so they’ll ask their friend 
(who is also correctly clueless) 
who will make something up 
because they don’t want to seem dumb.
The first friend will either agree 
or any say something polar opposite 
depending on the type of person
they are. Art critics will hear the word
about my art and write really long papers,
using really big words. These papers 
will mainly be about discussing the meaning
of “Besides” and the scuff mark on the upper
left corner of the canvas
that was made when I was carrying 
it off the Metro. And because a lot of people 
are talking about my art a rich guy’s assistant will
send me an email and we will argue 
over zeros. Then I’ll be rich
and each morning the sun will do sun
things as I pour grapefruit juice
on my face.   


Displaced Bird 
With a grey sky and heavy clouds behind him,
a weatherman holds a tennis ball 
up to his head  This will be the size of the hail! 
Call the cat in. 
Bring in the potted flowers. 
I’ll close the blinds, 
and switch on the fire. 
The glass door shatters,
you say  it’s just the wind
I chose to believe you. 
Last night while we were sleeping:
I was a goose, and the lake was frozen. 
You were you, and the lake was still frozen. 
The lake like glass, the lake weeds coated in ice 
you brought the goose bread. Again and again, and
the goose was always there waiting.
One year it stayed cold till April 
and you ran out of bread. 
After too many years 
the goose thought the lake was his home. 
You look at the goose. 
The goose slips on ice.
A mother pulls glass 
from the foot of a child.  



Dream House #8
chunks of the ocean are melting back into ocean 
form fake rain: water forced into gravity feels 
like rain on our heads when it’s dark 
the moon is sexy when it’s late theories 
are sexy I want you to explain the logic 
behind the dreams i’ll be having soon 
my dog will be bitten by a larger dog 
but my teeth with stay in their rightful 
spaces so you change the subject 
and ask why so many poems are about 
the moon I say it’s because there are poems 
about the moon you misunderstand what 
I mean and say duh I say no I mean there
were poems about the moon and poets 
read those moon poems and wrote 
more poems about the moon you ask 
what about before there were any moon 
poems and I say that there were a lot 
of years before 69’ and  how the imagined 
world is much more interesting you look 
convinced and I ask you to prove it 
to me 



Hands 
Eleven is imaginary. See? 
Logic isn’t fun. Once as a boy 
a white gloved magician pulled 
a quarter out from behind my ear: 
I’ve been searching for wonder 
since. Right now, in Birmingham 
a space botanist waters a fig tree
that is growing in a pressure chamber
replicating  Mar’sair. The math 
states we could live there, plants 
could pull light from another 
Sun, to bare fruit to the same 
lack of applause. Mouth pull in,
nose pushes out: two hands reach 
to grab a fig out of thin air.
I’ve been dulled too well.  


Close Sonnet #8

 

 

 
What i mean is that we trust in narrative. 
we turn on the drama to watch the 
drama but know damn well over time
the love interest will be love. the cancer 
will be treated. the sun bear will get his 
star fruit. the sun bear types numbers 
into spreadsheets even though he knows 
computers are getting smarter. for fucks 
sake there are bills to be paid 
 
 
 
yes the sun bear knows that one day his job will be obsolete. but right now
it’s raining outside can’t you just let the sun bears kiss? the movies are supposed 
to seem like life because we like things that we can relate to. the sun bear who
can time travel finds his way back home. it’s worked out for the sun bear so far. 
don’t tell him to think any different now.



Happy Poems Don’t Exist #1 
The group of intern sun bears have built a strong bond
by commiserating in the coffee line and at the fax machine.
of course the old sun bear bosses are incompetent
have no concept of the modern world etc. etc. 
there’s an equation about friendship equaling time
and like interests. none of the bears want to admit how cliche
it is to be enjoying each other's company & starfruit.  
elsewhere younger sun bears are learning
about AI  
sure the young sun bears do the majority of the work 
for the mortgage company. we know verifying income
statements is hard work. is it though? do they have to 
beat the truth out of the numbers?  unlike the old 
boss sun bear the young sun bears get paid no matter what. 



Happy Poems Don’t Exist #8
The sun bear is very good at solitaire and 
very good at looking like he’s not playing 
solitaire while at work. the sun bear has two 
states of mind waiting for lunch and waiting 
for home. at home there’s always too long 
before friday and sunday is loud. of course 
it’s been awhile since he forgot about the
better life he could be having. although i imagine
sometimes there is joy 
when the cards lineup like they are supposed to there’s a moment
of accomplishment. and when the sun bear wants to feel good 
well just let him shuffle the cards. lunch breaks give the sun bear 
something to look forward to. and coworkers can find common ground. 
we have talked a lot about the weekend. don’t worry. it’ll come. 



When I ask you to tell me what I dreamed last night 
“The payphone rings. You pick it up. We can now assume this is a dream. It’s windy and just hot enough for you to take off your shirt. So you do. You almost have a sixpack. You love your body.
This is a dream, so why not? All of this is about want. The man on your ear sounds a lot like
your father or the man whose house you snuck out of last night, boxers in hand, clumsy,
and unsatisfied. He says,  come back.  You hang up the phone because you can. After all,
this is your dream. There’s blood on the phone cord. You notice blood on your hand. You search the body for a wound: chest fine, arms fine, legs fine. You become preoccupied with the fineness of your body. Context matters. In this situation,  fine  does not mean woundfree. It’s the years
of waking early, choking on raw yolks, throwing rusty free weights over your head, dry chicken breasts for every dinner kind of fine. There’s a bird at your feet. You pick up the limp body. 
Wipe your handblood into its beak, toss him in the air, and he flies away.  Look at you, little saint!  The phone rings again, reminder: none of this is real. So you pick up the phone,  are you leaving yet?  This time, it’s cold. This time, you’re wearing a blue sweater, one red mitten, one white mitten. Logic would lead you to assume that your hand is bleeding. But you don’t want logic. 
Logic is boring. Logic is that 2 percent bank interest, but you want scratch cards. You want to take a week’s worth of pocket change, slam it on the gas station countertop demanding luck. Then scrape the ridges of laundry quarters against silver cardboard and reveal filthy delight,  ten times more ugly 
than couldbesurprises worth of delights. It’s a cycle. The phone rings, but you don’t want to answer. You know he will be yelling, impatiently yelling—so you don’t. You can’t. This time, you don’t have hands. The sky is empty. The temperature is invisible. You want familiar, so you imagine a bird. Bower bird, bower bird: collector of shiny things. You dream him a tree and soft twigs for a nest. You down cold beer and flip him the bottle caps. The phone rings, you tell him  wait. ”



Paranoia/Pronia 
There isn’t anything more absurd than silence.
When you press a button you expect action. 
So if after you press the button and the button’s 
action is to drop a grey humming bird who speaks
perfect Latin onto your shoulder, you should forget
gratefulness. 
I’m glad we got that cleared up. 
Just to make things more confusing
there are two buttons. Both red (of course), 
and come on, we both know you want to press 
one (or both) why are we wasting time:
a single  Nimbostratus cloud weighing
as much as ten thousand semi trucks
floats above your neck, yet, no one is fearful.
E very time a robin crashes into your neighbor’s
glass french doors it’s a conversation piece. 
Don’t you want talk about something other 
than the weather? 
Even in winter the elms breathe out
exactly what we need as if they 
have come to expect our poison.  


An Ars Poetica Where Poems Can’t Do Anything 
This poem is a trap. As you are trying to understand,
the metaphor of it all the windows are being paint 
shut. New notches are hacked into keys. Here’s something to keep you 
company: you’re a five leaf clover so no one admires 
your brilliance. Now you’re Keats, just having dropped out 
of med school.: the world is yours! You want to write poems 
about the trees  releafing , or the moon instructing the tides to eat 
up the sand of your neighbor's beach house but there has already
been too much said about that. Since the book about bird calls 
is silent, the TV is on, even though the african grey parrot can mimic
the sound of keys and can tell its own jokes to pass the time,; right now, 
while a seagull chokes on a condom wrapper, the robots we built
are building other robots who are not too fond of us. Somewhere else  
at a livestock auction house three cities over from Des Moines 
three businessmen are fixing the prices for broiler chickens, and 
there’s nothing we can do. 



After 30 years
in America the men at work still speak 
to my grandfather loud and slow. And he 
says the men in his dreams now only speak 
American too. He says the sleeping part doesn’t 
bother him,  dreams aren’t supposed to make sense. 
I’m told he has this one dream where upon landing
on the runway the airplanes’ windows break open 
and his passport flies into a crow’s mouth. In this 
same dream he calls America home: he enrolls 
in a night class to learn English so he can talk 
about Kobe and Jordan during his lunch break 
with his work friends. His daughter doesn’t get 
teased at school for bring leftover kimchi jjigae 
for lunch. She grows up and has a son who thinks
America is his home too.  
 Will you think less
of me when I tell you all my  what if’s 
are ordinary I’ve already spent 
this months powerball winnings 
ten times over Big apartment 
on the top floor of a tall building 
in a big city with fancy restaurants 
the kind where I can’t pronounce 
half then menu so I just order 
the bolognese When I die I want
my body shoved into a space tube 
and shot at the sun It’s not as expensive 
as you would think once you consider
that cost of more traditional options
My grandfather and I went 
coffin shopping and he came 
to the conclusion that there 
is no good way to be dead 
so he swore off dying That 
was ten years ago and he’s kept
that promise ever since I wouldn’t want 
to go to my own funeral It would be 
an odd affair No coffin No urn 
Few people Maybe where my grave 
should have been they’d leave a picture 
of the Chicago skyline view the penthouse
or even my framed lottery ticket Maybe on
that day when my grandfather is buttoning
his best black shirt after pulling 
its wrinkless form out of a dry cleaning bag 
the scientists in Kazan will have 
finally cloned the woolly mammoth 
and there will be a video on the news 
about the furred boy taking his first steps 
that would something interesting to talk
about over the catered room temperature
pasta salads There’s so much out there
that I can’t imagine wanting  


Hunger Island 
In 100 words or less
without touching my thinning calves, or pinching my sunken cheeks 
prove that we exist. 
Don't say anything 
about the mango trees: their fruit has been pastsweetrotten for weeks.
The sun says it’s August
noon in every direction, 
I rebute: of course the sand has been burning all along!
What was it again, 
that saying, about truth:
all the trees are falling but we take turns closing our eyes. 
You hold my face 
against your face,
and we try to explain the sounds, and the absence of objects. 
This is the nonsense we need. 



At night: maybe sleeping 
Some trees are falling 
will fall, have fallen. 
There maybe many finches 
suddenly displaced
without homes. Hopefully,
the trees do not, have not 
will not, land 
on anyone’s home.
The refrigerator sighs 
and takes a break. 
However, no chickens have emerged
from their chilled eggs in your house 
but, elsewhere, yes, 
elsewhere: many chickens, thankfully 
none of which see trees 
and think  home . 



Relapse Desire #6 
Don’t the cocoon. It’s been April 
for too long. Look at the clouds, 
their shape held hostage by the wind:
a fat boar being stalked down by three
anxious poachers.  No . Two, bull frogs
resting in the mud. Now, a fawn,
having seen its own reflection in 
the still river for the very first time,
darts off into the sky.  No . Everything
painted in the absence of grey. 
Listen, we can stay here forever, in Tucson,
rain is a fable and we don’t need
a story to fall asleep.  Forever Awake? 
Yes. Our pillowcases can be day shirts, 
and shirtshirts.  Night shirts?  Forget 
night. Look up: an owl thieves 
three robin eggs from their mother’s 
nest, strong gust, then loses his wings,
but not his feathers.  What about 
our hands?  Look at airspace on my two
sides. Did you think “arms”?  No. 
See, the calendar reads October, 
and no one is waiting, Don’t you 
want something to be faithful to?   



According to 
science I Should be dead 
but as a boy I was told 
the story of the man
who lived a week 
or so inside
the stomach of a whale
and you still wonder 
why I’ve been careless 
Six months ago 
you found me 
with nicotine patches 
stuck to my temples
yelling at the Gods 
What else can you expect
from me With a face 
like that how could I tell you 
about the months 
I spent in rehab gambling 
hair ties and mouthfavors 
with people I never knew 
I begged at God 
and you found me 
I use to believe 
my landlord would find 
my body a week into July 
and call my father 
He’d cry over the longhaired
vodkasoaked liver
With my casket closed 
he’d talk about the son 
I use to be He’d speak 
of  heaven  as if we’d
be reunited there	
not knowing God
already answered
each of my ugly demands 


Sonnet Composed of Wants 
[I’m sorry that language is the best we’ve got. 
Let’s get this out of the way: I can’t please 
your hunger, there will be no epiphany. I don’t
even know your face. Here: small symbols who’s
sounds we agree upon, have built a little grocery
market for you, take what you want: something
clever about the moon, endless nightcaps without
shame, the first half of the dream you can never 
remember;		 the delight in familiar
is worthless. Really, try to explain the difference
between an ocean, and Lake Huron, without
comparing size or salt.
] 


 Poem after writing an email to my birth mother 
If I was not American 
I would be at war. 
In Korea Kpop groups must still serve 
their required 2 years of military service. 
I am not very tactical and hate loud noises. 
I am grateful there are words
to make poems with. 

It’s a shame, really, 
how we have overused “best”.
I want to write verse about my favorite 
Korean restaurant on Lake Michigan Drive 
and how it is serves objectively the best boglioli.
No one can argue with blacked out windows 
and a sign that reads:
			 Closed. Thank you for your 
			years of support.
I am thankful to be here 
and also very sad. 



2am Bar Poem
Emptying into the quiet cold 
a man sings the song 
his mother use to sing 
to him during storms. 
Something something  about crying. 
He knows the rest
or at least enough 
to keep him 
comfort. He knows 
about the salmon 
fattening under the ice
platedriver: finally safe 
from hooks and bear claws.
Two lovers stumble out 
and just like a movie 
a blue Honda pulls up. 
They smile at the man 
but don’t try to sing along. 
They know if he spoke 
they wouldn’t understand. 



Meeting
Here is a window 
in my kitchen, and
you’re watching me
from outside that 
window. I’m pouring
cereal into a juice glass,
but you already know
that. You think it’s strange
but you’re the one outside 
my window and if I knew
you were there, you’d 
be the strange one. 
If I saw you I wouldn’t 
want to invite you in 
and you already ate 
so you wouldn’t want
to come in. I’m eating 
slowly not to enjoy 
the sugared flakes 
but because I have nothing 
better to do, good. We 
have something in 
common. 



Bad Small Business Owner 
I didn’t see anyone I didn’t know 
for weeks. I thought really hard 
about things I had forgotten like 
trapping sand in a cheese grater 
or something more trite about 
wind. On Monday I read a click
bait article that definitively proved
that we are indeed a combination of
the five people that we spend the
most time with.  Then I brought my
mirror to a pawn shop 
and said “this thing can see ghosts!”
and now I have a thorough understanding 
of the fluctuation of liquid silver prices 
and the exponential regression in value 
of electronics. I want to open my own store 
whose walls and shelves are set up in a 
spiral. The outer shelves will be lined 
with things everyone likes. But as you 
go deeper in the items will keep get 
more and more niche and in strange 
combinations. Till you find me sitting
on a grey reclining chair at a 75% angle, 
snacking on banana Laffy Taffy, while playing a game
on my phone, watching early 2000’s Big Ten football,
and listening to that one podcast where Siken talks about how the right margin is the divine. 
If anyone ever comes back there 
I’ll have a best friend
and we will be surrounded 
by all the things we like.
We will be too busy 
to talk to each other. 
   



Obvious Metaphor 
This morning my frogs and I went for a walk. 

I had to carry one of my frogs because he is old 
and doesn’t like walking too much 
but likes being outside, and doesn't like being left
home alone. 
Another mother duck and her ducking were walking
their (larger) frog on the other side 
of the road. Their frog charged at me 
and my frogs, and I threw myself 
onto the ground to protect my frogs like a 
shell on a turtle. The mother duck said “don’t worry
she is a nice frog”. I say “I don’t know that,
you don’t know that
for sure in this situation
that your frog will be a nice frog.” 
Her duckling said “sorry” and the mother duck 
said “have a nice day” but I don’t think 
she really meant it. 
My neighbor’s frog recently got attacked
by another frog and had to go to the frog
hospital, which is sad because the frog hospital 
is a scary place, but also sad because no one 
has frog insurance, and it takes a long time
to save up a new emergency fund. But 
emergencies can happen whenever  
that's why they are called emergencies. 
I just wish other ducks would be more 
mindful of other peoples’ frogs.
is what I was telling her. Then 
Clover thinks I’ll be a very nervous parent.  


Friends?
I wish I had more friends
who are happy 
with the way I view them
as friends. Like, for example “cool calculator guy” 
from my bio lab, I really like talking shit
about other classes with you 
before lecture as our overworked TA
stumbles in from a “meeting”
that (always) ran(s) late 
but I don’t necessary want to join 
your frat’s basketball team. 
I never liked sports.
I’m the guy who says “sports ball”
but ironically. 
In high school my English teacher said 
that sarcasm is the lowest form of humor. 
Of course I said “what’s that?” 
a medium amount of people laughed. 
Slot machines are addictive
because they are programed to win 
just enough times to give me a feedback loop
of false success.  At the grocery store I stopped smiling
back at strangers and memorized the aisles 
for frozen strawberries and oyster crackers. 
I usually only own one pair of shoes
at a time. For a while people say “nice shoes are they new” 
because people like talking and it feels good to say 
nice things. Then the shoes are invisible. Sometime later, 
a friend texts me and asks if I want to go to the mall.  


Love Letter: A Monologue 
I saw your father last week he says you’re doing well
  I’m a sad 	sad boy my mother’s son. I’ve dipped my feet 
in olive oil When you left 
did you mean to leave
a match? The bedposts are on fire. there is no place
to kneel peacefully.
Where are you staying
I walked until 
a man speaking to the sky he said he could tell me 
which god was God I wanted to believe in anything  I’m 
not the kind of man who can sit in church alone. 
  was that you on the beach yesterday. You look so thin. Have you been eating?
  So few places would accept a man
barefoot I wanted a mouth full of answers
But, as a backup I counted the sand 
three times and sorted it twice I 
would tell you the number but,
it is unexplainable Can you 
imagine a tower to heaven? If you 
climb it You can not tell anyone 
what you saw What good is a story like that?
I drank tea from leaves
picked by a woman said to be four times 
my age This
her life time ministry 
I wish I loved something that devoutly 
My dog was chewing the bone you gave him it 
made me think of you 
If you love me say you love
me If you miss me 
walk in circles till our
history is as mistranslated as 
 old testament scripture  Are 
you dizzy yet  This planet is ours My 
world is my world Your 
world is not my world 
Are you having fun  Must 
we be in clouds before the wind 
gives us shape 
I never liked the way you spoke why
must you always talk in riddles
  With a face like that It 
must be easy to forsake your 
mind In some parts of the 
water your perfection means 
nothing You can 
forget to blink I can 
pretend that it is your hand
against my jaw line The way 
the water jarbles our voices I 
can practically pretend to 
be both of us
 



Haven’t you 
snapped enough rabbits’ 
ankles to know 
it’s no use to scream 
I’m sorry 
into voicemails how 
many  this is the last 
time ’s do you think 
you deserve at your worst 
sleep found you 
with your shoes 
still on and morning 
caught you 
with your stomach 
leaking into the threads 
of your dress
shirt I wish 
your shadow 
would scare you 
back to well 
each morning I wish
your dreams 
wouldn’t slip 
out before you 
find yourself trapped
 inside this body 
I know you 
want to wake 
again with hunger 
between your teeth 
again chase all 
the right things 
again I want this 
for the both 
of us	 yes	 I know 
when I say 
you  I mean 
me  I’m sorry 
I’m sorry 
it takes two 
to be shameful  


Your iris needs light to make an image 
so it’s a shame that material science is the slowest
kind of magic. Right now in Palo Alto scientists
are cloning an extinct marsh deer knowing 
very well that they don’t have the equations 
to keep him alive for more than two hours. 
They named him  A001.  giving themselves hundreds
of more tries before having to admit defeat and
move onto B. When you open a math book 
you expect problems. When you raise your hand 
you expect attention. If you’re alone in a white lab 
coat in the middle of the night splicing genes 
you know you have to clap your own hands. 
Light reflects off the river and dives into 
the eye of a fawn, its shape flipped upside
down and back again before entering its brain.
The unfamiliarity of his own face brings him 
to alertness: a car horn blares, he darts away, 
knowing fear more than anything else. 



Caring Allegory 
The mallard looked sad 
and the rabbit asked
why.  Because tomorrow 
it will rain.  It’s been
alright before
and before.  But what if 
this time there’s too 
much rain and overworked
sewer grates flood the streets
like rivers  Then you’ll be Happy.
So why are you still sad?
Because I love you too.



Preparations 
This morning you’ll wake to the ring of your doorbell and there will be a box 
waiting for you. You haven’t ordered anything in weeks. After
examining the box you'll notice air holes, meaning it’s home 
to something living.	  Do you feel summoned? 	 Maybe it’s a bullfrog 
resting in displaced river mud.  Your kindness creates a new list 
of tasks. You go to the pet store to buy another box: this time it’s full of feed mice, 
who die to please the frog. But he won’t eat, and the mice multiple. You build 
a rat cage, with running tubes, and stagnant wheels to pass the time. The frog finds
a path to a river. Now: too many mice, and you still  with  the same dread.
You imagine opening a museum of ordinary fears.
A room full of mice, a tall tree to climb, a small windowless room to sit in 
And a fun house with mirrors.		 But who would come?	 It’s more 
for the adventure; like the road trip movie we rewatch knowing damn well 
they never get to Tucson. Don’t you want a reason 
								to wake? 
There are so many things we should ask for: cribs, car seats, and a spinning mobile 
where small furry creatures chase each other's long tails. You ask me if I like the name
Meadow, and I ask about Clover. Reality doesn’t wait for its answer. 



Dogma
 
 
My flank could be cut with a Santoku knife. 
You would marvel in my stomach meat 
when it’s drenched in soy. And she wishes
there wasn’t a cigarette box on our nightstand. 
 
I’m narcissistic in the sense that I’ve replaced
birth names with satin sheets. 
 
The solution is simple: 
 make the music louder, let the fan spin,  
 and wipe the stomach acid off the toilet seat. 
 My love is in the next room sleeping.  
 
If I throw mirrors against the sidewalk, 
I wouldn’t spend nights sticking forks down my throat. 
Gravity doesn’t care about the conditions
I placed between my brain folds. 
 My neighbors practice Hinduism. 
After a week of fasting they left naan on my doorstep. 
In the next life, I don’t want to be beautiful. 
I want to be a lionfish. 
 
Rats live between hunger and want.
I once saw one gnaw off its own tail from inside a trap. 
He just carried it away to somewhere. 
She left her body prickly. 
In the way that she was raised
to be God fearing and snorted Ambien. 
 
There’s a place between God
and the woman who says she loves me: 
a place for shame. I sat there placing nicotine 
on my temples. When I said I loved our bedsheets,
I meant I could take my shirt off and let them cover my rib cage.  
             


A Tightrope Walker Before He Tiptoes Between Skyscrapers 
I don’t mean to alarm you but there’s a crowd 
gathering outside. All secretly hoping to see you  
fall. This is why we slow down 
at car wrecks, why felines try to bat life 
back into dead mice on our doorsteps. 
Just admit it: you love knowing you could misstep 
your way to the foot of God. You could have 
been normal: sold overmiled cars to gitty teens,
life insurance to welldoing paranoids but you didn’t. 
I don’t blame you. Right now, there are rooms full 
of withholdingdrunks pulling off calendar pages 
waiting to die sober, priests splashing holy water 
onto stillborns. I’m sorry I didn’t mean 
to get graphic. Your mother is counting her prayer 
beads as a hospice nurse is tuning the television 
to the news. Now steady your breath. It’s time 
for our test. What’s the worst that could happen:
you wake up washing God’s feet with olive oil, 
retelling your worstself’sfavoritestories, 
punctuating each one with  Lord, please forgive me.  
  


Ars Poetica #3
I want to live  in the real world. 
Where atoms have agreed 
upon their organization, and 
there are more mammals 
who eat green plants than mammals 
who eat other mammals. 
Last weekend at a reading in Long beach  a famous poet said,
metaphor in poetry is dead! 
and then went on to explain how metaphors weaken
both objects they compare.
Example: comparing a lover’s face to an August noon.  

Answer: what if it’s too hot? Or we are in the part 
of Alaska where the sun never comes up?
Science Answer: There are many studies that  prove
symmetry is the key factor in facial attractiveness (sigh.) 
This morning I looked in the mirror 
and withdrew my manuscript
from four different contests. 
I want to be in the real world. 
I want my poems to be about real things. 
My poems like real things but only when
they do other real things that they 
can’t really do. 
How long does it take to get a pilot's license? 



Remembering Shadows  
 
I don’t mean to sound ungrateful 
but when my father stopped sending blank checks   
and getwellsoon cards I didn’t expect the trees   
 
to be making faces Trees are held voiceless making faces at each other's    faces so they can see themselves
 
for the very first time I’m naked with the December Oaks Can you   sketch my rib cage? This is the wellest   
 
you’ll ever find me I’m twenty two    and unsure if I can ever grow back    into my past self: I don’t want   
 
thick rainsoaked air I don’t have desires    anymore Long ago cavetrapped    men drew pictures of outdoor shadows
 
They didn’t know about creatures or their    teeth They knew shadows Shadows    can be tender if you want them to be   
 
isn’t that bewilderment?
In the foster home I’m told   
I never cried That was my life   
 
I didn’t know any better If I told you that    you didn’t have to eat or sleep    that you could find exactly what you need   
  in every face Wouldn’t you? On the phone
  with this voice      I could be anyone 


Recovery/Relapse ( Forgive Me )
Remember when it stayed January for months?
When the lake wanted to become a lake again
but couldn’t. We stuff our hands into blue mittens
and took turns sitting on them for each other.
My body would’ve charge in any direction
that you’d let it. It’s much harder than you think
to time travel back to a past self
and ask it for your old behaviors. What January was it
again when we saw the winterthinnedgoose walk over
the lake and you went outside fed it stale greenspinkled
sugarcookies out of your hand.
The goose got fat and you got well. The goose came back
every morning till it didn’t. You waited for me till
you couldn’t.
It’s August now and I’m alone again
This morning outside my window a fox walked
across the porch with a fat liver between his teeth
sweet organ blood on his white chest he’s delighted
My dear please forgive me
I’m starting to think this is all I can be.



Seminary School Dropout: 
In Fort Wayne
The  job is to feed faith 
to those who don’t yet know 
of their hunger. 
When the door opens: 
take advantage of that midwest
kindness and say anything 
first but  God.
I came here to become anyone 
but my father, and when I button 
my shirt I like to pretend 
I’m trapping my creatureself. 
 
It’s December and I when I see an angel 
on top of a Christmas tree I’m told 
to move on go help someone 
who still needs saving. 
Before I could walk by 
a door swings open:
Oh please come in 
you must be so cold. 
With a cross around her neck
she hands me a cup 
of ginger tea. Then shows 
a faith filled smile. 
After  Thank you  I’m speechless. 
She fills the silence with the story 
of her paster getting a speeding ticket 
rushing to the hospital
to baptize her stillborn child. 


The core of faith isn’t suppose 
to be logical.
 On the flight to Fort Wayne: 
In the event of a change in cabin pressure 
air masks will drop.
Secure your mask 
before assisting others. 
In the midwest we don’t cry 
in front of strangers.  Instead 
You’re mother must be so proud 
of you .
Instead: I nod. I ask if we can pray. 
We both know this is for me. 


Tonight I will be selfish,
take my shirt off, 
and steal all the manna 
for myself.  


Steps to a New World
[ some call it sadness ]but I’m starting to think it [is much more than that.] 
I
Read the gospel of Luke. 
Stop after Peter returns 
with a net full of fish. 

II
Forget the meaning 
of water. 

III
When I point to the ground 
and say water 
we will all become holy. 

IV 
Look one God is spitting 
on the sidewalk while Another 
holds a pocket knife to the neck 
of a Third. One God is asking  
Another for pocket change, 
while a group of Gods 
are covering their bodies 
in war paint and drawing 
X’s over other Gods’ temples. 
  

 i said new
not better 
never mentioned saving 
i mean this [ 		] 
that you’ve been blaming 
on your body or your body 
being stuck 
to this world [                ]  


Purgatory: Hyenasall
Breathe. Show them you’re not ready 
to die. Scatter this manna. 
Even birds of prey must hunt. 
What happens next will be a certain type 
of violence. This world is filled with creatures 
who promise to know
 the best way to go about dying. 
[
								]
Give me your hand and feel the bands 
of flesh they tore out to please the hunger
just to have it return. Haggle with the wingless  
sky as you grow hungry with our mistakes at your feet . 
								I never said I could save us.  



Birthnames [The spirit lives in between/the parts of a name] 
after Kaveh Akbar 
it’s been two decades and I’m fine 
without mine. At the core of my tasks
is avoidance: white pills, hell and ear 
mites. I mean this in the way 
that race horses never have to learn
their names only that the leather 
whip means  faster. 
[
					]
and all I know is this long sprint 
to nowhere. I don’t mean 
to set my grief free. I’m not asking 
you to listen, just say anything.
I’ll believe you. 



late elegy 
what took so long 
always another apple to be split
 in two whole milk thickening 
to spoil
the tomato soup spelling out
  none of this matters  
	you will die alone 
i want to be faithful
		as morning hunger 
				today i’m learning 
little violets sprouting 
		in the kitchen sink
				and mold on the basement ceiling 
are the same kind 
		of carelessness 
				the gas tank emptying 
the radio says tomorrow
			it’ll rain again
				and someone’s child 
is waiting to be found
		at the bottom of the lake 
					i’ve been dulled by bad news
repetition and crushed melatonin
				it’s windless and all the gulls 
							are fattening 
on the hot sand the tides
 are anxious and unsatisfied 
			the cloud won’t grey 
that’s fine i want the surprise
			oh these waves are pulling 
						in every wrong direction 
there’s too much sadness 
			in the water 
				now there’s too much sand 
in the water now 
Jakob, I wish you were here. 


All this 
for what?  Please don’t tell me how long 
I’ve spent climbing down the rockcrumbled walls of this mine
hole. Listen, I want to set this pickaxe down as much as you want me 
to. But, in the world that we are left in only diamonds can cut diamonds
and this faith that we have been shoving between each others’ teeth has left 
only emptywant in all my molarspaces. Hunger delusion: sometimes in that mine
I shine the headlight at my face, look back at the vacantdiamondspots
and pretend that the shadow isn’t mine. I tell him that he’s a good shadow boy, 
that he is more than just light and an extension of my own misguided self devotion. 
God, I want more than this hungerlonging. God, I want a mouthful of littleshiningearth
disasters. God: men have uprooted entire forests, quenched their thirst with calves’ blood:
I hack away at the roots of a bramble bush, the dry earthwalls fracture. I am wanting an epiphany but expecting something much worse.



September Children/Faith Production 
I 
Cold winter with idle time.

  II

Fresh life. Say the trees 
are sick. Say God 
is God. Say the ground 
is loathsome, and lifeless. 
III
Leave piles like little 
alters. A clean lawn: 
a sign of devotion.
IV
The snow pears coated 
in ice like jewels. Like 
prayer is explained 
to a child as the good 
kind of want.
V
I remember waking 
in March. Our yard 
was full of violets: 
Whitepurple, and 
white and purple.   
 About the Soul 
the soul is a ten point buck lapping the cloudy pollen film
off the surface of a fox hound’s bowl 
on the front porch of a hunter 	I never said  thirsty 
in the forest the river mud hasn’t been dry for years
and each morningmagic wets the grass
with sweet water:	 the world is bad
on the other side of three locked doors the hunter sleeps 
as his tree hued socks soak in doe urine hoping
to disguise his body with the possibility
of love all of this is unnecessary 
sitting on the cool side of the front door the foxhound teeths
on a frozen venison liver   
the leaves crisp again 
the hunter wakes and sprays 
his window air conditioner
clean for winter storage 
the calendar says 
it’s a bad time 
to be godless 



What do you want to do today 
On the television: a picture of a boy who has been missing for three days. I ask you what day
 it is  Thursday  knowing very well that that’s not what I meant but anything is better than  too late. 
We are sitting at our table, and the bowls are empty. We are hungry. Does it matter if we have eaten? 
You pour cereal into the empty space: it’s morning or the day has already been too long. 
Every star already has a tribe
and a pretty name they call
themselves  Ursa Minor.
We know he’s still out there. Left somewhere, to go elsewhere.
To be missing from one place, while always missing another. 
The television is not on, so it was my mind. It’s morning. so all we have is the past. 
Pop quiz: would you rather have hunger or sleep with a pocket knife in your pillow case?
Answer: you wanted your father’s open palm, but everytime it was a fist.
Answer: tell your teacher that eye bruise was from t ball practice. 
We should be planting trees, 
ones with the big leaves, that make dark places, 
for moss to grow. Then he could walk north 
and find someplace to mistake for home.  

Spring Hunters 
In a blind three fat hunters draw straws to see which one will play deer. 
This doesn’t make any sense to you yet. But it’s warm outside again, 
and your brothers are getting restless. Mom is still at work like always, 
and dad still hasn’t returned from that milk run three months ago. 
We can all see where this is heading. 
There are only two bows, four boots and no straws. But this is expected. 
Tell yourself this all is just boredom. 
In the woods the trees are bare, and the fawn is spotless: meaning helpless, 
and filthy with mud. In the blind two hunters flip quarters to see who gets the first shot.  


Untitled 
The morning dew coated the water lilies
and all day the petals fell off in the January 
daycold. The pond’s surface turned to glass 
and the koi became motionless and content. 
Now my long walks to nowhere shifted 
to nights of rocking into paleness. It goes like this:
gravity shows up and doesn’t care how you deal with it 
If April comes I’ll soak my hair  in olive oil 
and comb out the months of aimless tangle 
it could practically be religious. I’m trying 
to say that if you want to find god, you’ll  stumble 
onto something holy. Are the kois thrashing 
in hunger? Are they scraping gold off each 
other’s tails? Right now I’d believe in anything. 



To make winter 
 shook the oaks leaf
bare,  raked the soft 
soil then  planted pine 
saplings for . 
		Now we have January forever. 
Just like  wanted. 
[Result: the river is not a river anymore.

Repetition has a way of making even the most brilliant 
miracles seemingly vanish: 
the heart of a ice trapped frog 
waiting to thaw back to life,
ice coated river weeds warming 
in the mouth of a witless goose. ]
 want to go there,  want it to be 
spring so we could go to the river 
and throw smooth rocks 
at our reflections, ’d watch 
 watch them ripple back 
together then you’d take my hand 
and say something about 
starting all over.

Key: 
: you/I 
[ River Noun: a large stream of flowing water] 



I scared off my past self 
and everyone else followed. It was December 
and the trees were bare and unrecognizable. 
I welcomed the Canadian geese to my back porch
with stale rye bread. My past self used to howl 
for  this  and  that  but I tamed him with daily meetings, 
ugly proclamations, and long prayers. 
My body has been silent in all the right ways: 
motionless as a January lake. The next task:
make a list of people to make amends to. 
Family that gave me too many last chances, friends 
who by now could only recognize me by my voice. 
Now, I’m reciting I’m sorrys to voicemails, 
now I’m plucking olive branches from my rib cage
and licking the wrong sides of envelopes. 
What about the pregnant women 
on the subway who you didn’t give my seat 
up to. I told the sketch artist to draw  hopeful 
and  joyous : that face could be anyone’s 
but mine. Oh I’m all alone, oh I’m my own
stranger.  Soon enough the maples will become maples 
again and that notyet bornboy will become man. 
He won’t need a father to tell him not to end up like me.
The clouds will  be fat with rain, the pond filled
with cattails:  there’s no one left for me 
to apologize for what I’ve become. 



if you still want to talk 


about sad things I'll tell you the story
of the fawn that found me on the road side
when the gravel was covered with orange leaves 
The blackberries we found and ate in fistfuls 
when we couldn’t sleep How he became 
my houseguest and ate through the tablecloth 
I’ll tell you how the snow came in November 
how I scraped it away with a hunter’s knife 
Pardon my bad table manners 
Sorry I’m no good at this What if there 
are no new worlds and we jumped into 
the water and never came out Our shadows 
would lay flat on the river mud And no one 
could know who we belonged to 



A Fuckboy Love Poem 
Outside our window 
a bower bird twists
the green flesh of twig 
and weaves it into his nest. 
It’s almost ready. Reciprocated
loveseeker; curator of shiny 
things.		 Close the blinds. 
I’m not feeling metaphorical 
tonight. Once I soaked an oxtail 
in hot water, and lived off 
the broth for a week, to thin
well. Once, I snorted gas station
pills to get jacked. Obviously, 
this didn’t work. Take away 
the metaphor and what’s left 
actually happened: loathsome 
as 		ope, no, no 
I mean		just
	could you open 
the window? I’ll untwist 
the paperclips 
and he won’t have to be alone. 



News at Willis Tower 
Wake up. The prophets are outside 
spitting their dead language 
on the sidewalk.  This world will give us anything 
that we want. 
Consider the autumn fawn born 
white spotted knowing he’ll grow 
antlers by spring and there’s a boy running 
his fingers over the holy book
written in Aramaic you should be terrified.
At birth you’re given a name 
and at eighteen they unhitch you 
from your bedpost to do whatever you will.
Frantically they scrub his blood off the concrete. 
A mother gripping her prayer beads is rushed 
in to identify the body.	 Sometimes 	we don’t 
know what’s best.    


RelapseDesire/Boyhood  Tomorrow please 
It’s loud and mindless like an entire Pluntonion moon exploding. 
When I run my fingers over the needle marked crease of my elbow
 	I actually taste desire. 
My father use to place three orchids
 in a glass pot. I tended to them
through winter and spring. They would bloom, he’d be so proud. 
I can’t picture his face anymore. 
Last night I touched my arm and became a needy child.  
Do you like how you found me? 
Washing arm blood off my leg hairs. 
	
grab me by the collar bone
and scream me awake. 
I’ll have a dream for you. 
In the desert there’s millions 
of grains of sand waiting 
to become something lovely. 
I’ll build you a vase
I’ll find that unimagable land 
where the orchids always grow.  
Ah, there’s your face. 
The desert sky is empty. 
Not a single moon can find us here. 



Bulimic Boy 
My dog is old and can’t jump up on the couch. My cat is at the age where she pees 
everywhere. My mother has me put a three foot board across my bedroom’s enter 
and close the door. I don’t really understand why both actions are needed. But then, 
again, I still eat cranberry jelly before every meal, then eat slow for enjoyment before rushing
to the bathroom. Then turn on the sink. After, mouthwash helps too.  Better safe then something about deception.   


Waiting on the Next End 
The corals are greying	 clown fish are wrapping themselves 
in dead anemones The redwoods’ own proximity causing endless 
burn All while you're busy dulling yourself 	with self love
I don’t blame you	 Two weeks ago a farmer unearthed a pterodactyl
 
wing while uprooting a blood orange tree Now the bones are begging 
dust for company in a museum basement	 quiet applause		 silent 
celebration 	it wasn’t too many lifetimes ago  all the prophets
had their tongues ripped out for heeding warnings of this end 	I’m trying 
to say that all our miracles are mundane and surrounding 	topsoil 
over clay 	a water glass left on your bedside 	Don’t flatter yourself 
if you could time travel back 	to preach this ending 	you wouldn’t	
You’d teach all the parrots to recite your name 	climb up the clocktower 
and proclaim yourself king 	or god  	Look at you 
apathetic dweller 	bewilderment shunner 	  	I’m sorry 	
Maybe I’m projecting 		I want something more powerful 
than a god	Please sit down and tell me that story one last time: 
the man who got swallowed 
up by a blue whale and lived beside crille and shrimp heads
in stomach bile for three days until he tied his undershirt 
to the whale’s uvula and emerged unharmed 		Now 
I wake knowing I’ve been stumbling past my deathplace 
for years 		I wish my father was here 
We could dive into the part of the ocean where it’s always dark 
He’d point out the light hanging above an angler fish’s mouth 
and I’d pretend it doesn’t want us dead  

Long Distance 
 
She’s visiting and expects me to become a past self: dressed up  with short hair.  
I’ve poured the vodka down the sink.  
The rats are gleefully gnawing on each other's tails. 
 
 
On the beach Taylor fiddles with my leg hair. 
Undershirts soaked in stomach acid. Measuring the space 
between my ribs. Forgive me, you were never meant to see me like this. Given space water rushes away from itself. She says this has to do with particles. 
 
It’s science! she, exclaims. 
 
First, hands tremble. Then a body drenches itself in salt water. Being anywhere leaves me covered in want. 
 
Taylor turns off the lights and asks me to undress her. 
She turns on Chopin and expects me to be graceful. 
 
I’m sexless as a fig.                        All my desires are far from here. 
 
 
Coffee grounds and now I can speak to her like a prophet. Of course, you love me like this,  a cat chasing its own tail. Full of joy then pride. 
Its downfall? A mouth full of sharp canines. 
 
Now, the feline is remorseful. 
 
To my dismay, there's a part of me that needs to plunge in murky water. 
I am only a man 
a God forsaken mammal. 

Despite what you’ve heard 
desire does not live in the heart. 
Desire latches onto your throat 
					
or at least mine does. I scream 
my wants into a zip lock bag, walk outside
and give them to the wind. And when I pretend 
they aren’t coming back I know this 
					
is more about ritual than anything else. 
						[
						]					
I am trying my best to believe 
			
the wind doesn’t blow
 to rip sparrow eggs from their nests.
But It’s already June. I know it’s silent
for everyone but me. 



Decade Old Elegy: Personal Dream 
and you wake. You’re in the passenger’s seat
now here’s the first choice:
look forward or 
look left 
what you chose says a lot 
about trust. Let’s say you look left. 
The man driving looks like your father. 
You wouldn’t have to look forward to know
where you were going; the last place 
he saw you. Rehab, when he dropped you 
off. Both of you knowing damn well 
that he should be checking himself in
too. Let’s not talk about that. 
Okay, so let’s say you look forward. 
You see the fields of poppies, you pat
you pocket, lucky you brought 
your pestle. It doesn’t matter
who’s driving now does it. 
It never did. Obviously,
none of this is real. You buried 
your father years ago you must 
be asleep. For the first time 
in years you can count 
your sobriety in months 
not days. This has a way 
of minalizing accomplishment 57, 58, 59 
1. Say your best prayers 
and believe them, 
take your filthy pride.
Guilt has no use 
here. One of you 
had to watch the other
die, win the race 
and claim the ugly prize. 

Remembering Prayer 
Common occurrence: a dream 
where your teeth fall out. I’m told 
this means you’re fearing 
loss. Before last night 
the only thing to wake 
me was the return 
of ugly want: cutting 
wet mattress foam 
with a bread knife 
before washing stomach
bile out of my hair, pulling
tangle away 
from tangle. But last night 
I dreamed I was bare
gummed and a man 
was driving implants 
into my molarspaces. 
Of course I woke
in prayer.  God,
this is the first time 
you’re hearing me 
right?  You missed 
all the quiet wants 
turned unrelenting bargains,
turned sweat drenched screamed demands? 
God I need you now 
more than ever.  I want to believe 
this: but I know what I deserve 
is much worse.  



Sleeping Together 
If I fall asleep on my back 
I’ll wake you up with my screams. My dear can you listen
one more time: it was night and we were at the river 
again. It was dark and I walked in not knowing
if I could swim back, but knowing I didn’t want to. 
My pocket lint was made of lead. You swam out 
and dragged me back to the riverrocks 
It’s dark so we thought we were all alone. 
It’s night and shadows always seem dangerous. It’s night 
and a riverhunter mistakes you for a rivermonster biting 
my neck. He draws back an arrow he’s a bad shot.
The arrow hits my halfdeadbody instead of yours. 
Water, and lovers’ blood look the same in the dark
and your tears are forgotten as the hit the algaecovered
riverrocks. My dear please don’t roll me over yet.
I’ve been ready for this heaven my entire life. 



Half Bathroom 
I’m standing brushing you
out of my teeth.
beside me you are sitting.
you are wearing only my shirt.

This isn’t how my parents 
or 
your parents 
fell in love.
The mirror is in front of me.
Tucked behind my chin 
hairs is a decade of catechism .
The mirror is your father.
My irises are his fears .
You stand up .
The lid flips down.
I step over
you wash me 
off your hands. 
You take off my shirt.
I rinse out my mouth. 
I left my bible in my nightstand. 
There’s an orchid next to the Dove bar. 

When we leave 
there’s nothing left living.  


Because I’ve ran out of ways to talk about home 
I’ve survived all my theories. The one where I dipped loose cigarettes in iced vodka 
to get drunk. And the time when I thought I could tame barn cats with tepid milk. Here I am. 
Let’s try again: for every turtle there are three fistfuls of unborn turtles, whether that be rich yolk the on beak of a proud gull, or fractured white shells on the sandal of an aimless beach goer.as he retrieves a beach ball for his lover.  Where were we? For every leaf on the ground there's a bare branch spot growing another leaf. Move on crispy leave, the oak has already forgotten you. 
Remember our lucky turtle: inside each egg was the same turtle, meant to witlessly dry in the same hot sand, choke on the same drifted metallic coated plastic bag. But only our turtle gets to be the one. For every hundred leaves, there’s a pile of leaves waiting for more company, a father with a rake in hand, and a child waiting for an amusing jump. Does this make any sense? If a leave is on the beach it’s a windy day. If a sea turtle is sleeping under an oak you’re dreaming. It’s December here in Rochester, and right now in Busan a boy heads outside in snow boots, knowing exactly where this mother buried the kimchi. 


An Asian Boy Returns to the Midwest:  When winter stays 

Attacks on Asian Americans skyrocket to 

100 per day during coronavirus pandemic 

 Changing America March 31st 2020
till April I expected the chatter
 of winter thinned cardinals or the squirrels thieving
 from bird feeders   instead wind	wind not strong enough to uproot 
the trees but strong enough to keep everyone inside but better wind
 than myself inside stillness leaves you nothing but the past now more than ever 
the soil is composed of dead fathers and dead fathers’ 
fathers let’s not talk about that now our sadness has nowhere 
else to go on the television a reporter in Cape Town says lions now lacking 
any predators are sleeping in the streets not knowing what streets 
are just knowing the sun warmed gravel is becoming theirs again lions not unlike 
horse have no use for names live between hunger and fear sharp canines 
and leather whips my neighbors live with fear and hope of returning 
to normal both of which have dressed in ugly fashion 		spitting 
on us	 throwing eggs	all things exchanged for fear  it’s not windy 
enough today as I walk my dogs on our usual route a man wearing 
a face mask crosses the street to the other side (probably for the best, probably 
for social distancing I thought) a gust blows in he mutters 
go back to  [windredacted]	  fucking bat eater  tragedy doesn’t make the world 
go bad tragedy strips us like the wind rips branches from the trees leaving 
nothing to hide behind so yes stay inside or wear that mask and when you 
throw your fears into the wind at me I’ll pretend you’re saying  God bless you too 
selfish me I’m sorry I’m sorry I’m not sure I’m ready for the world again 
just yet 



Desire/Excellence
i came to America too young
to be foreign, so all my dreams 
are American and contemporary,
present and blinding as morninghunger:
a fat gull scavenges for loose plastic bags 
and their crumbtreasures
on the winter sand. On the television 
a well dressed man (who back home people 
would ask if he  was my brother) thanks the University 
for his success. All While i’m stealing one too many
week old sandwiches from the food pantry.
Look the tangelos are losing 
their green. I won’t apologize for the smallness 
of my delights.



Don’t get up. 
Outside that door
there’s an entire world that wants us
dead. Cacti store century old flash floods 
in the soft of their arms: I believe
in drought and the unpuncturable silver
tongues of desert lizards.  How much sad
ness can I blame on history, I’ve been unburying 
my father’s fathers for years now and the clouds 
still won't get fat with rain for me. We could scatter 
out belly fat in the sand for the vultures, cut off 
their wings and pretend we aren’t dying. Leave 
your shove. I’ll take off my shirt 
and dab your gut wound. Lodge our house 
key in the soft of your foot: when they find 
our bodies they’ll come back to our room 
and know we had nothing to leave. Close 
your eyes and take me by the elbow. 
This world has left us 
to become whatever we like. 
Yes.
I’m terrified too.  


Hospice Facility 
There are men who carve
pocketsizedGods
out of aspen blocks.
These are given to the fastestdying.
I gave my grandmother a Nambe cross 
to place on her bedside table 
hoping that it would let her live longer. 
She can’t speak anymore 
but each morning I call her 
and talk about a new part 
of heaven. 


Sometimes I take those little 
wood prophets: each time 
nailnotched with near 
death terror. 
The nurse holds the phone 
to her ear:  squirrels that don’t steal 
from the bird feeders. Blue jays that stay
all winter, or places where winter 
never comes at all.  
Each time the nurse 
says my grandmother 
is smiling: these are my favorite lies. 
My grandmother has never liked the cold. 
She used to say she was going to move 
to Tucson and paint sunsets. 
No one really knows 
how to go 
about dying. 
I need that God
comfort when I visit 
that place filled 
with people rocking 
into paleness. 
I place three figures on my windowsill. 
The sky turns orangeredyellow. 
My phone rings. 


Forgive me
I was making the heaven 
I needed.  


Dress Up  
 
 
The men in my family tell me 
American girls love American boys
in the dark. 
 
I asked my grandfather how to dress. 
He wasn’t sure what “American boys” wore 
so he dressed me like my brother. 
 
Who wore only polo shirts
and wanted to go to Yale. ` 
He left for New Haven 
as I crawled through the spice cabinet. 
 
I can almost smell the ginger root 
simmering in the wok. I want to get fat 
on white rice and Kalbi, 
 to hoard each short rib
in the back of my cheek. 
 
As I wait for her, I fill my stomach 
with leftover French fries. 
 I salt each one just to know
that it's there. 
 
When she arrives 
I’ll ask to keep my shirt on. 
What she thinks is more important 
than what she sees. 
 
I can picture my childhood bedroom.
The blue and red yin yang flag 
hanging from the ceiling. I saw it 
every day, so I learned to ignore it.  


Sitting in a Pew

 
The farm child prays to God. The underbelly
of a lamb covers his foot. Now, of course he’s beautiful: 
hands folded or rain, his throat filled with hope.
Pray away the November snow. In the pews mothers
 are filled with the fear of their children snorting
 white twig powder. The organ blares; 
now all the words are soliloquies,
 outside the temple men are gambling, 
throwing mule bones against the walls. 
In town  the child trades chaff to a woman 
who’s left her name in her nightstand.
Across town a man is rubbing mandrake 
root on a stranger’s collar bone. The aphids are hungry. 
I don’t think we can all be loved here.   
 
 
 



Facing Heritage in The Emergency Room

 
As my own stomach blood drips between my teeth, it’s summer everywhere else. The hum of tube lights takes the world away from a body. 
 
I am asked for: Reason for visit. 
Throwing scissors is harmless. But each blade
comes up blood stained after passing by the voice box. 
 
Date of birth:  
I’m much too old to be seen as anyone’s child. 
If I knew my mother  
I’d ask her what to hide from myself. 
 
As for gender:  
My hair nearly touches the small of my back. 
When I undressed the nurse saw my bare armpits. My skin too sensitive for roll on deodorant.
Now, every time the doctors speak of me  they are concerned with pronouns. 
I only care about the iron taste that covers my tongue. 
 
Country of Citizenship, Ethnicity: 
When I arrived I was too young to be foreign.
Back home in Seoul boys still must go to war at eighteen.
Unless they’re famous. Olympic medals must hang from their necks. 
Not silver. Only gold can save boys from gunshots.
I can’t be trusted with my body. 
 
Now at the scale: 
In my country of birth, I’d be considered tall. 
There’s no comparison in the Midwest;  I am “too much” 
and “not enough” all at once. 
This is not supposed to be a problem for men. 
 
Lastly, Insurance, Consent to Treat: 
They will stitch up my stomach lining and feed me warm JellO.
If I speak gently about my history  Medicaid will deem me well.
If you run with scissors, point them inward. Blood from the stomach is richer than any other. 
I could bleed out, poor. Or live without worth no, much worse than that.    


MeeGook: America:  Beautiful Country  

 
From afar there’s still an American dream.   What is it then between us?   
The news anchor says the world is ending.  
Peace seems as unimaginable as a garden full of orchids. 
 
What is it then between us?  
There are bomb dropping drones that can’t distinguish a threat from a child.   
Peace seems as unimaginable as a garden full of orchids. 
Yet, I still find a way to sleep through the night. 
 
There are bomb dropping drones that can’t distinguish a threat from a child.   
There’s a note on the windshield of my Toyota that reads Go back to China.   
Yet, I still find a way to sleep through the night. 
My mother is back in Korea, she still thinks America is beautiful. 
 
There’s a note on the windshield of my Toyota that reads Go back to China   The news anchor says the world is ending.  
My mother is back in Korea, she still thinks America is beautiful.  
From afar there’s still an American Dream.   


Relapse Desire/Stepwork

 
 
What makes you want to drink tonight?
When I was a boy my father bathed me on turntables.The Priest is dipping my hair in chlorine and assumes rapture will follow.Because my bloodstream is like heritage.
 
Why did you call me?
You’re beautiful and parts of me are still twentytwo and carnal. The rest is curious. Drink from the gin bottle and I could kiss you forever.
 
What have you tried instead?
I am reading the Book of Revelation so I can be terrified of hell. But nothing can scare away this false necessity.  ⅓ water  ⅓  food  ⅓  air the Prophet said to keep my temple as such. 
There is no end just withholding. 
 
Why can’t you stop?
When you’re young you can wake up unruly. Face shaved, room clean, whiskey warm as breath.
There’s so little to say about neat. 
It’s practically unnoticeable. 
For weeks I fell asleep on my front porch:  shame cannot be felt alone. I went back to my childhood home to fall asleep in innocence. 
 
Did it work?
If I fall asleep like a child
I can wake up helpless. Now
I can be thankful for the end of fall. My broken Toyota; the long walk to anywhere. 
            



You’re More Graceful  
 
 
than ever. Your mother says, she wishes you were in an urn resting atop her dresser. Instead, I’m told your body became a home 
for the gnats. Since you left  yourself laying on the back porch, there’s been living everywhere. 
Just as always. 
 
You didn’t choose this world, your mind, or the body it floated in. 
 
The faults of our brains are predetermined random and unrelenting. They are stronger than beauty, even with those dimples on your cheeks. 
 
I picture the wings multiplying, and feasting on your saliva, gratefully. 
You’d find joy in this. You picked this for yourself. 
 
 
Without you, it has been January in both directions. Bones’ decay is the slowest of all.  
 
According to history spring will come. 
The earth moving towards its kinder path. 
 
And your body will become indistinguishable with the soot. 
That’s all you ever believed in. 
The pleasant hum of wings above the breathing soil. 
 
            
Your mother left your favorite summer dress hanging in the windowsill, the rosary stitched right under the neck line.  


No More Fables on the Third Date
 
 
Forgive me, not long ago
I was hiding butter knives in my pillowcase.
Before ground pepper dances on romaine
she’ll ask about my father. 
 
I’ll tell her when a father tosses his son 
into the air to fall back
into his arms. How a father becomes a god. 
 
I’ll leave out scrubbing my cheek blood 
from the sink and the dinner tables
where my mother was left with no one beside her.
 
Does she know that boys grow up and fathers grow old? 
 
According to psychology I’m ½ my father
 the rest is kissed by lemon rinds and drenched in butter. 
 
Three days ago, I was craving my initials into wine corks.
I haven’t slept since.
 What else do you want me to believe?
 
At 7pm the white tablecloths fill with tea lights.  
Humor tells me to recite ghost stories.
 
When I speak softly I’m asking you to place your eardrum
against my throat.
Cortex fear creeps off my tongue.  


The Mold is Growing

 
As a child the mold seemed innocent. Whiskey rocks chipped away at the dry wall; the basement became all mold.  
 
And now the toilet bowl is covered in decadence. 
Despite this, you’ll still find me tending to the mold. 
 
Hors d’oeuvres: crackers covered in cheese.  
Which I’m told is mainly dying mold.  
 
Dipping into ugly things, don’t expect to be graceful. 
My lover knows how to trick away the staying mold. 
 
She says, take a walk. You could go anywhere. 
A squirrel opens a green walnut, filling itself with mold.  
 
If this doesn’t work, practice altruism.  
This is how to go about killing mold.  
 
Even in beautiful places: the walls lined with picture frames and orchids. I’ve caught myself searching for mold.  
 
In the old woman's house the cupboards are still full. 
I found a bottle of her late husband's favorite drinking mold.  
 
Cho, why are you still searching for mold?  
This world would give us anything.  
  


If we make it 
to that island there will be no humans 
left. The horses ate the leather off each other’s 
backs and forgot they were ours. Or remembered
they are horses. Would you swim out to that island
with me? We could both be there. But, if left alone
we become our past selves, 
or at least I do:
a mouthful of lime, mangled hair, toolong teeth,
haggling with any god I thought would listen.
How long did I live soaking my stomach lining
with whatever promised to take my body 
elsewhere? What was it again, that I asked for? 
I don’t want to be that man again. I won’t 
be that man again I will not. But each time 
I fold my hands I find 
I’m inside myself again.
Now, I’m the saint.
Is there a prayer for that?

 



A Fuckboy Love Poem 
Outside our window 
a bower bird twists
the green flesh of twig 
and weaves it into his nest. 
It’s almost ready. Reciprocated
loveseeker; curator of shiny 
things.		 Close the blinds. 
I’m not feeling metaphorical 
tonight. Once I soaked an oxtail 
in hot water, and lived off 
the broth for a week, to thin
well. Once, I snorted gas station
pills to get jacked. Obviously, 
this didn’t work. Take away 
the metaphor and what’s left 
actually happened: loathsome 
as 		ope, no, no 
I mean		just
	could you open 
the window? I’ll untwist 
the paperclips 
and he won’t have to be alone. 



Hospice Facility 
There are men who carve
pocketsizedGods
out of aspen blocks.
These are given to the fastestdying.
I gave my grandmother a Nambe cross 
to place on her bedside table 
hoping that it would let her live longer. 
She can’t speak anymore 
but each morning I call her 
and talk about a new part 
of heaven. 


Sometimes I take those little 
wood prophets: each time 
nailnotched with near 
death terror. 
The nurse holds the phone 
to her ear:  squirrels that don’t steal 
from the bird feeders. Blue jays that stay
all winter, or places where winter 
never comes at all.  
Each time the nurse 
says my grandmother 
is smiling: these are my favorite lies. 
My grandmother has never liked the cold. 
She used to say she was going to move 
to Tucson and paint sunsets. 
No one really knows 
how to go 
about dying. 
I need that God
comfort when I visit 
that place filled 
with people rocking 
into paleness. 
I place three figures on my windowsill. 
The sky turns orangeredyellow. 
My phone rings. 


Forgive me
I was making the heaven
I needed. 



Future Poem: nine months sober 
You’ve been still in all the right ways: 
you came back emptyhanded, 
freshminded on all your spring
timewalks to nowhere. Just like you were supposed to. 
Last December your throat was filled
with want. Your task: throw out everything 
you thought was keeping you alive.
Tie your hands together 
with zipties, sit down, and wait
for your worst company  
to see themselves out. 
You waited and they did. 
Your reward: this endless silence. 
Now, you are all alone again.
Tell me about the god 
that kept you company, 
through those coldsweatfever
chills, the long nights trapped 
inside yourself. Here, 
take this quill. I’ll dip it in ink. 
Make a list of everyone 
you’ve tried to beg
back into your life. 
Now look around.  
This is exactly what you asked for. 



When it’s cold my past self wants back in 
There’s mold in my rice cooker. Little stems are sprouting 
in my sink. They could be violets but I know they’ll just stay
little weeds. It was January when he showed up
cold and loathsome, crawling under the door, up our bedposts,
and back into my mind. I’m sorry I didn’t mean to wake you. 
Did you love it when I left? I know I’ve been careless with everything
I’ve ever had: small perennials, birthnames, and my alltooforgiving
body.  Do you know how hard it is to do well when no one is watching, 
to tend to water lilies when the April rain lasts till fall? If you were here 
I’d crawl through the pondmuck. Maybe my feet could get tangled 
in milkweed. I’d look back at you and you’d get to look 
right past me. The dense moss is freezing off the bare branched 
elms. You would swim out to me if I wanted saving. 
I loved it when you left: knowing I could stay like this forever. 


A Cage in America: Bastard Brothers 
Korean Standard Time is 13 hours ahead of the Eastern Time Zone. 
Let’s only eat radish tops and forget our bloodlines.
Now we can set down our sketchbooks and throw out
all the halfdrawn pictures of men we hoped 
were our fathers. We can finally focus on ourselves.
Rumi says,  the body is what the body does
and we’ve been charging in all the wrong directions: 
frying everything in butter, crushing green pills 
to sleep and gladly blaming it all on the men 
we could never meet. But Listen, in our new
homeland there are no boys who look like us 
and speak “American” and back in Seoul
it’s already tomorrow. Look at me.	 Here, 
take this sandpaper. Scrub away whatever 
you don’t like. 		We were never anyone’s to forget.  


Relapse Desire #3  
I want to tell you about the fire ants
that have been congregating underneath our loft bed 
for weeks now and when I do you’ll finally 
have a good reason to leave and I’ll have a good excuse
to become myfavoriteself again Last night 
while you were asleep I was busy crumbling 
old rye bread and texting old friends 
about my old self and all the ugly things
he loved Can’t you see the fire ants spitting 
war signs at each other beside our feet
Do you see their joy
This isn’t going to get any better
My dear say you love me one more time
pack your things save yourself and leave me 
to damn myself back to life.



Relapse Desire: We feared the bears 
so we made bear traps. Steel snaps through bone marrow 
Consider this: there are places in the world right now 
where the sun forsakes the sky all winter 
and single rock sharpened to a point can fill an ocean 
with blood and leave a blue whale lifeless. Its fat is keeping 
an entire village’s lanterns lite through April. I’m trying to say 
that there are people who wake up and find 
exactly what they need. That isn’t me 
that’s never been me. This morning I woke 
to a bang on my window: a crow tried to fly 
into my  bedroom thinking he’d perch 
on my bedposts. Now there’s a fistful 
of feathers in my nightstand.  Here I am 
tooearlywoken, shaved face bed made. 
My dear, I’m sorry the soil is frozen solid 
instead I’ll dip you in almostfrozen 
water and leave you on my porch 
till spring. Then the rivers will become rivers 
again and you’ll melt back into a crow. 
It’s April and the violets are photosynthesizing.
While I’m glueing feathers onto feathers,
I’m reciting all my favorite keeptheuglywant
prayers to myself trying to make a crow a crow 
again. Is this why I’m here?  



Answer Key
[ [we] like the sonnet It keeps its promises
First. [we] are the sad sun bear in the forest. 
of course. the star fruit laying on the bear trap 
is tempting You are a sun bear. and traps 
do their job [We] are stuck here now 
Enjoy the fruit Don’t worry. you’ll be saved:
the bile in your liver has value and poems 
have form for a reason You want to know
what happens to my paws if i am left alone
Sorry] 



Keeper’s Thesis 
Lately I’ve been finding all
 my responsibilities absurd. 
Clap twice if you think  
you’re a visual learner. Stand up
 if  I think I get it but could
 I see an example?  All the  thinking
  needs an object or objects to pass
 through. And when enough
 objects gather up, we call it a structure.
 The flag pole is not structural
but has become a statement. 
Similar living structures have gathered
 up, and we call it a village. Because
 you can’t be sure about the status of
 your new neighbors' vases, a plate
 of cherry scones is an ideal gift. 
Thank you for the standing ovation. 
Let’s get back to work. Still a lot of work to do.  


#1 
the group of sun bear interns have built a strong bond
commiserating in the coffee line and at the fax machine
Of course the old sun bear bosses are incompetent.
have no concept of the contemporary workplace. etc etc
There’s an equation about friendship equaling time
and like interests: none of the bears want to admit how cliche
it is to be enjoying each other's company and starfruit
Elsewhere younger sun bears are learning
about AI  
Sure the young sun bears do the majority of the work 
for the mortgage company  Verifying income statements
is hard  work!  Is it though Do the sun bears have to 
beat the truth out of the numbers Unlike the old sun bear bosses.
the young sun bears get paid no matter what 



#2
the middle aged sun bear drives a truck full of star fruits 
from san jose. to boston. and other major metropolitan cities
There’s a camera on the dashboard that tracks his eye movement.
to ensure he does not drive beyond the maximum miles per day
allowed for sun bear drivers by the federal government. which was 
put in place after many days of meetings over catered star fruit lunches.
funded by sun bear taxes dollars Here doctorbears congressbears and lobbyists 
discussed the factors of alertness All while the sun bear drivers were busy
on the road
The work environment isn’t good for the truck driving 
sun bears It’s not fair [  ] know But. the sun bear has a 
large college fund for his cubs. who seems to be interested
in the numbers and the physics of it all
The nursing homes are getting better too 


#3
the difficult snow The sky is making work 
for the sun bear. driveways to be shoveled. per season 
snow plow contracts getting their money’s worth. etc etc 
more car crashes There are no snow days in the 
adult bear world. tow truck drivers work on commission 
Elsewhere snow is a fable Someone’s ex boyfriend 
is in san diego planning a ski trip Cacti have evolved
to store enough water to survive for years Someday 
the trees will realize how cold they are 
It’s okay Spring always happens and the sewer grates 
are reliable When the sun bear gets spleen cancer. the 
doctor can remove the spleen The star fruit trees 
have been making star fruits longer than the sun bear 
been a bear He trusts the trees. even if they cant’ know



#4
a successful looking sun bear (nice car/house/etc)
is on television. trying to get all the sun bears at home 
watching from their couch to buy his special powder. 
to sprinkle over their star fruits It is  proven to increase 
mental performance  and thus increase cognitive ability. 
to help perform daily tasks The sun bear picks up his phone 
Each day he wakes up with a slightly more positive mindset
A few months later he meets an old high school friend.
Wow you seem a lot happier!
Not to make this any less romantic. but when the sun bear sees 
his love. serotonin gets released into his brain His pupils 
enlarge He is a happy bear. or. a bear who feels happy
and is displaying happiness Luckily for the bear he does 
not know which  


Keeper’s Log 
A wiser me could make this all about money, would trace the line between  joy  and  day job  and label it  false dichotomy , but I don’t know much beyond  effective online course design  and  alternative treatments for dog cancer  but of course that isn’t enough, wasn’t enough. I want to argue that given the right scale, given the right attention anything can feel religious: ice on the toilet seat meant: snowday, and I still pray to the patron saint of coupon codes each time I type in my  customer loyalty number . I don’t want pity, and I hate using  I  I would like to reassure you that I’m mainly joyful or ruminative.  And all the things that bring me joy are either a phone call away, or are sleeping at my feet.  And when that isn’t enough I remind myself of old knowledge, all the AKC registered dog breeds from 2015 on, where all my favorite quarterbacks went to college, and ignore that nearly all of them had to get real jobs too.



#5
and elsewhere is it probably raining 
Many other sun bears are equally successful.
but their skill sets are in more valuable 
markets. such as star fruit growing. taming tigers. 
or. managing hedge funds In many places 
there are other sun bears who were born 
in zoos and thus have little opportunity 
to be successful sun bears With all this in mind
 it is absurd that [  ] can sleep at all 

There is nyquil for nights when the sun bear feels like cheating 
grief His job puts enough star fruits on the table and he 
can be home in time to go to his cub’s little league games 
That’s exactly what happens at the end of all the movies Right 
The charities do good work and the weekends are present/alive

#6
sports are fun to argue about. because subconsciously 
[   ] know it doesn’t really matter that the quarterback
threw  a million interceptions!  It’ll still be 9 am on monday. 
the traffic will be traffic. the quarterback gets his check. 
sleeps fine. most likely isn’t  injured . just  hurt  and 
your boss will accept  whatever excuse  when you 
show up late  The sun bear puts bolts onto 
the tires and tires onto the cars The traffic 
will be traffic. even if he doesn’t 

The sun bear quarterback is a hero to many cubs who play football The cubs 
get good grades. go to college and become productive members of sun bear 
society Or today at the a.a. meeting one sun bear reads a franz wright poem. 
and all the sun bears in the group stay sober through the weekend Everything 
has to matter  Right?  right Please don’t try to prove the sun bear wrong

#7
the quarterback needs to learn how to throw 
the football with his big. sun bear paws His 
coach gives him drills to practice on his own
before practice. the quarterback practices 
well. then goes to practice At practice there 
are many large defensive lineman sun bears 
trying to chase him down The quarterback 
hurts his arm The doctor runs onto the field
The doctor practices medicine 

All the sun bears are working really hard and trying their best Does that make you feel 
better The doctor sun bear went to school for a very long time and has the internet 
for when he forgets the half life of drug compounds While one sun bear monitors 
the heart rate of the sleeping sun bear on the o.r. table. the doctor sun bear hands 
the scalpel to his fellow Right now. it doesn’t matter if the sun bear had other dreams

#8
the sleepy sun bear can not fall asleep 
He stays up all night and watches motivational videos.
says to himself  Okay, tomorrow I will get it together.
Sometime after 4 am sleep finds the sun bear
Maybe he dreamed of going back to school to become a 
petroleum engineer. or the winning lotto numbers: [  ] can’t 
be sure It is slightly colder than usual this morning as he fills up 
his gas tank to drive to work 

Because lottery tickets aren’t expensive: hope doesn’t have 
to be a bad thing The sun bear buys his tickets. in the office 
he thinks about all the things he wishes he could have At night 
he listens to the winning numbers One sun bear somewhere 
actually wins This sun bear gets to keep his dreams 

#9
the sun bear is very good at solitaire and 
very good at looking like he’s not playing 
solitaire while at work The sun bear has two 
states of mind: waiting for lunch and waiting 
for home At home there’s always too long 
before friday and sunday is loud Of course. 
it's been awhile since he forgot about the better life 
he could be having Although.
   imagine sometimes there is joy. 

when the cards lineup like they are supposed to: there’s a moment
of accomplishment and when the sun bear wants to feel good.
well. just let him shuffle the cards Lunch breaks give the sun bear 
something to look forward to and coworkers can find common ground
[  ]have talked a lot about the weekend. don’t worry. it’ll come 

(#)
it is noon and sunny. like the start of a romance movie.
the stock broker sun bear is at the park eating fruit cake
Alone The rest of his friends are at work. taking care of 
their cubs etc etc. because that is what adult sun bears are supposed
to do It may be his birthday. but [  ] can’t be sure. if all the clouds 
are spelling out  alone  and  i’m sorry.  or something about pity
He reaches to the sky. or for a napkin. but the balloon screams
Today. like most days. the sun bear needs to find something
to do with his paws 

So the stockbroker sun bear stares at graphs looking for  double tail dives.
because he knows that based upon past market performance. this is the best time
to invest He has learned to ignore that each dive on the screen means someone else’s 
cubs go without starfruit for the night There’s a book of poems on his book shelf 
that says  what feels like joy  Please. leave this sun bear alone. can’t you see he’s on the phone 

#10
for a long time it was cold A perfect environment 
for polar bears The polar bears thrived. ate the seals 
injured the other polar bears. wrote the laws. 
and chose which ones were “worth keeping” Today 
it is warm and there are many star fruits growing. 
yet the sun bear is still perceived as a weaker bear 
Not because of their small bodies. or lack of applicable 
skills In the trees young bears are learning sun bear history
Their books’ are water damaged from snow.
________________________________________________________________
the sun bears at the university too There are many sun bears right now 
in lecture halls listening to lectures about sun bear theory Some sun bears 
will go to school for a long time then write their own sun bear theory. 
others will graduate and subconsciously take this acquired knowledge 
into the workplace Thankfully. they need to put more seats in the lecture hall 


Keeper’s Log 
Maybe I’m still being unclear, by  this  I meant  life  and living. Right now for a living,  
I teach an introductory poetry class. It’s rather depressing when you think about it, here sitting around the table are a dozen younger  me’s  hoping one today to be the one sitting at the head of the table. They all try to call me professor, and I say  Not yet, maybe if I’m stubborn enough.,   and all my professors say  No, no Professor, X is fine.  There are a few rules to running a workshop, I’m told,  No talking  and,  Have assignments graded in a week.  Mainly I am getting paid to say  Delight!  and  New possibilities  which of course means  rework  means  revisions , means many more hours tippy tapping away at the page, means I forward the email about  career services  to my students: language and its games back at it again

Keepers’ Statement 
Because forms have a definitive end. At the DMV we know we can get back in line once the page is signed and dated. Because in the first poetry class we did a form a week and I miss that structure very much. I remember the last week of the semester pacing back and forth in my shitty apartment (where the heat didn’t work, and of course the mattress was on the floor, silly silly cliche boy) writing a sonnet, turning the sonnet into workshop and the professor saying “okay, wow this poem just works, it’s lovely”. Because I read a book titled “The Sunbear” and I am woefully over influenced by what I read. If I had to categorize the voice in my work I would say “a worse Tao Lin who instead of having an understanding of narrative studies & the foundations of grammar  has spent his entire life in academia thinking about the ramifications of breaking a line here instead of there. Because I read too many submissions about unrequited love, the same uninteresting metaphors, and too big words  and asked myself “what if we didn’t have such beauty paint”. Here is one stick of chalk, do your worst. 



Keepers’ Statement Cont. 
Because the idea of a desk job terrified the 21 year old me, and I have learned to convince myself that there are only three necessary pieces of furniture: desk, chair, bed. Because that fall my dog had died, many people had/were died/dying, and my mother couldn’t stop listening to the news channel where the host screamed “Open up the restaurants”. I want to know what it means to have many things happening all at once. What things can or can not be held simultaneously. Or, (and this actually happened) for a year I was afraid that the tornado warnings would become just tornado each night. I packed up everything my dog would need for a week and put it in my backpack. Taffy used the back up as a pillow. He never had to know how scared I was.  


Further Considerations 
there are many  you ’s 
the you that is  i
the you that is  youthereader
and the one where i
am definitely thinking 
of one specific person 
in their best form the  you ’s come together in concert
they joyfully join paws
and become one in the same 
i  am you /i  is you/ you  are  you/
and  you|  not you| but  you  are you



Example 1 







Example Two







Additional Example 

Example: Applying Knowledge 
Bear claw Bear paw Sun bear liver oil
Your upstairs neighbor knows about your night
terrors and assumes you know too But. you don’t
Of course you don’t The absurdity of dreams.: flying
fruits Last night you were the bear. or. the starfruit. 
or. the son of the porcher waiting for dad to come home
Alarm clock Soon. work again Between hunger and
waiting for its return. there’s always last night’s game
to talk about




If Time : Challenge Problem 





Keepers’ Log
I won’t take back what I said  I don’t care about money  I’ll expand, I’ll  complicate.  I love my dog, and didn’t know about pet health insurance and they are raising the premiums of my own health insurance.  And I love my partner and there’s only so many  Best free things to do in X  and every Christmas I like to  get the check  when their family and I go out to dinner because somewhere in the credit card shuffle I hope they are reminded of  it’ll be worth it  and I  just have to go finish up my coursework for a year or two.  It’s so cliche   or I am an  archetype. You're welcome  screen writers in Culver city. The hero’s journey can still be a low budget film



NULL HYPOTHESIS 
a stop light is a tool
a comma means  yield 
a light turns or 
turns off but a sign 
is a sign for as long 
as it is a sign 
remove a stop light
and [  ] must be more cautious
sure for a while more car crashes more cars
needing brake pads full emergency rooms 
But  no there can’t be a but You
know the rules old[   ] made the rules 
pick a tone and the narrative stays there
the truth matches the narrative 
You just get to tell the story 


Friend  log 
Someone called we the watcher but we like to think of ourselves not like that or keeper but as his friend. as your friend: two thumbed joy seekers, nose in theory books readers, the stay in school too long sleepers. I: much too clumsy with my words. I: need the bears because of their friendly fur.  A while back when we started this job someone told us metaphor is failure and said “I’ll show you.”. I would like to turn your attention to the absurdity of the ordinary. the good after how are you’s in a way if I was being earnest: I: simply asking  are you miserable too.  Does it feel good to have a day job to blame it on? 
			



#11
 
Enough with the bears, or get back to the bears,
you say after reading a poem. You know the sun bear
is really you, or, [  ], or that person that you
see everyday, walking to the same office building
as you in the same suit. The sun bear can’t be    because
all you know, is you. There's frost on the window [ ] are not
aren’t in Tallahassee. You are not there with  . You see 
the star fruit,  but not its branches.[  ] have agreed upon the
meaning of enough words to make it through the day. Sometimes 
[  ] need to argue, and this is why some words don’t need to be 
taught to cubs. If the sun bears read the same book, then they 
will have something to talk about over the phone. The two sun bears
will enjoy each other’s company. [  ] need to assume that this will be enough, 
if not, why bother with any of this. 



#12
Fire fighting is danger work that doesn’t 
pay too well, and it is very hard to go 
to med school. All sun bears must grow up,
[  ] know. [  ] do. The sun bear’s favorite author
is very old, but, has many books out with a publisher
that rhymes with penguin. He says,  Anyone can do
it he’s just the one who did.  The sun bear finds this
motivational. He has the normal amount of bills 
to pay, and his best friend is getting married soon.
But, this young sun bear stays in college for too long, because he is 
scared of the world. The sun bear knows that the world will always be there. 
Waiting, not on, or for him, but still there.
waiting  maybe is not the correct word, because the earth
is just mashed up compounds. In seminar today the sun bears
will have a robust conversation about the ramifications of sentient trees.



#13
Outside the window: the loud white snow, it doesn’t matter
who has unloved you today. [  ] don’t have to talk about what’s 
in your glove box. On his way to work the sun bear sees 
many cars on the side of the road, some engines on fire, 
many people will be without telephone service 
for days, weeks, maybe longer. Let’s not talk 
about bear cubs, or haggle with life insurance lawyers.
The Sun Bears have enough star fruits to end world hunger
ten times over, but of course  don’t really mean hunger, 
and, of course this time the Sun Bear is [ ] (surprise!). 
The sun bear doesn’t like to think about the possibility 
that he has everything he could possibly need 
to have happiness. He likes hope,
because it gives him something to be hopeful for. 



#14
One says the sky is falling, or the sky is going to fall. Those are the choices; attention isn’t an option. The news station needs the sun bears’ attention to create data to show potential advertisers that in between disaster, and future weather predictions informationseekers will turn into customers. It's fine: the bad end of fine. [  ]need the news  and, the news reporters’ cubs need food.//\\ While waiting to hear about the mood of tomorrow’s sky the sun bear walks to his kitchen to get a beer. He pops it open, and takes a swig: it’s cold and familiar. 
His lack of reaction is eerily similar to comfort. He glances at the label and sees the mountains turn blue. If you were inside the mind of the sun bear you may see him thinking about all the cool kids from his high school who used to drank beer on the weekends. 



#15
Television is too good. Streaming has made| all the old shows too predictable. In the| 
hospital someone is sick, they don’t| know why, they still treat the bear. The bear|gets better, till the 30 minute mark. Then,| the bear starts convulsing. Cut to two| commercial breaks later:   want the beer|not yet, but, subconsciously tomorrow|It’ll be okay.|Commercials aren’t so bad. The television network gets their money,|creative teams get a paycheck, and the sun bears get to purchase| new varieties of star fruits that they are programmed to have |a predisposition for. The sun bear likes to try new things. It makes|him feel accomplished. It doesn’t matter to the sun bear if it was all planned.



#16
Cars are very heavy, and driving to work is a risk. 
Nothing that heavy should go this fast. Also,
the professional black jack player drives across the
country in his RV, going casino, to casino counting
cards, and dodging risk management staffs. The best
advantage players have a 2% advantage over the house.
The sun bear has lived in his RV for weeks now. His eyes 
are not heavy, but, his eyelids feel that way.  Family? 
It’s better not to think about it. All  ’m saying is that
one day the doomsday prepping sun bears will be fearful, and full, 
and quietly gloating in their bunkers. Some sun bears do not like talking about 
Mars, because they’ll have to admit that one day [  ] will need to call it home.
When the home team isn’t in the playoffs the sun bears bet on the game to make it more 
interesting. It’s comforting to know [  ]will  miss some of this life.  


Keeper’s log 
You ask about the  turning point  or  the inciting incident . Well, I’ve  always called  Taffy  a  friend , and said  What’s up bud  every time I walked through the door, so that isn’t it. I’ve forgotten the color of your irises many times over: it’s become an inside joke. Online I saw a tweet that said that the body replaces each cell slowly over time, and after seven year you have an entirely new body. It’s been a while, but not that long. More like, another degree, and many late night calls  I think I’m going drop out. 
A few days back I realized I’ve been saying  We   but who am I to talk for  We  who am I to speak for 
We  Whom amongst I would allow themselves to get caught grieving.   There’s the  time when we  had to  spell out  T R E A T  and the time when we still do. I still am.    


Friend  Log 
Upon completion I stumbled upon another complication: how to tell the hero’s journey 
without a grand epiphany. No silver trumpets, no late night turned mornings crying on the bathroom floor, thus no white birds landing in my palms. I’ll just say it, in deep July my responsibilities diminished, I did all the legal drugs many times over. Now it’s  later  now it’s 
just following up on time. I guess unlike the movies, things happen this way. Slowly. Overtime. 
Taffy got sick, then was dying. Now: I: thankful for past tense.  


ABSTRACT 
So you wish the sun bear had a name you wish 
you could be closer to the bear fine fine
name him jakob if you already know a jakob 
i’m sorry this may or may not be a different one
if you were already friends with a jakob do you 
like him  more or less now
[the distance between you and i 
means there is no  we 
there are many  we ’s
the  we  that is you and i
the  we  that is We: the people(s) 
and the  we  that represents 
that time between the first  we  thinking 
“I think I can reach that leaf” 
and texting a friend “I hope you are doing well”]
unfortunately every word already means something to you
that’s why i need the sun bear
is that why you are raising your voice 


Discussion Section Series 
We got too metaphorical on our way
to plant star fruit the sun bear got lost
in the nouns unlike the world there could 
be fields full of orchids sun like august in
sweden if he wants it he wrote it so his fur 
grows long because he is a contemporarily 
domesticated  sun bear overtime he becomes
 uninterested in climbing trees soon it’ll be
dinner time the zoo ships dried star fruit from san diego it’s better 
now that we can store star fruit in the freezer and order shampoo
from our couches the sun bear climbs goes to a rock climbing gym
because there are too many parking lots in the city to have trees
on his way home from the gym he listens to bad pop music  
while driving 70 mph: it’s never been a better time to be a sun bear


The sun bear is enjoying his vacation because the food|is different not cooked in vegetable oil the warm|climate helps too but he knows he can’t stay here| for too long the cranberries will get  familiar  he returns to too many emails and voicemails|his work friends will ask him how is time off was he will say  great| and ask about the quarterly reports or maybe there is no “win”| the sun bear can hate his work and be happy to come home or|overtime the sun bear will dislike his work and be left with no hobbies|the cub who loved art class became a painter after the gallery closes|the sun bear must paint new work to sell the painter bear|is the same level of happy as other sun bears|and we know what happens to them


There I compared the sun bear to something you knew so you  could get delight
in a new layer of a thing you already know  You  feels a little too hostile harm 
means permanent the dictionary says this we have to trust someone earlier 
we had a talk about the sun bear having too much trust in the trees today is 
the present we need the chairs so the forest is gone our sun bear is there his cubs
will overtime lose strength their limbs
The story is still developing when the sun bear fell off the tree only you
and I were there we are developing the story  fell  is that what we are going with
the sun bear  or  the tree?  overtime the sun bear’s body will help grow many trees
is what we are telling each other the sun bear returns home from war to many 
thank yous or his mother will quickly hate the word  hero


The sun bear tosses a bowl of star fruit into the air 
he snaps a photo of the fruit gathering in recognizable shapes 
he stares at the photo for a very long moment and sees 
the cure for cancer he shows the photo to a friend
who sees a long list of numbers they rush out the door 
to buy a lottery ticket later he shows the photo to another 
sun bear friend who asks  what kind of lens the photo
was taken  with maybe should be concerned about that bear
he is a logical sun bear so he does not try to think
about how he wants to have an absence of wants 
if there were an irrational number of sun bears we would be counting 
forever we know that there are many things they  could  be worried about 
and a few others that they  should be  
a lot of things could go wrong  and the sun bears would be 


Sure fine
I want the sun bear to be happy too
the days are always the same amount of  too long
and there is either  too much  to do or what there is
is  boring  but he’s happy to return home 
to his lovely sun bear family and have something to talk
 about when the cubs win the world series it’s a great story
cubs grow up because that’s what they do 
we shouldn’t look into that still river 
the moon will be here soon if the air doesn’t feel like 
being windy the sun bear can see himself 
or he could return home use his closet mirror
all the advancements are too helpful and present 
to be noticed the sun bear's neck ties are all the wrong
 shade of green turn the lights back off can’t you see 
the sun bear’s wife is trying to sleep


Okay you got me I cheated the last poem
was too long I didn’t think you were paying 
attention I am glad you're paying attention
isn’t that what we both want the sun bear reads
books on bear traps so he can feel empowered
the trap expert paid the ghost writer because he likes
to be listened to but isn’t good with words and the 
ghost writer is on a plane to malaysia the sun bear
isn’t sure what the opposite of a zero sum game is 
he hasn’t read the theory yet he still believes in the good
of it all he plants the seeds and waits till spring 
there’s been star fruits all along why bother convincing him
there’s a cub being born in the san diego zoo 
today we do not choose the definition of home 


Friendship Log 
Truth is meaningless, no one can tell me if I was or was not there when the tree fell. Once, on a sunny day a tree almost fell on Taffy and I, I’ve been fearful ever since, been walking staring up at the trees whispering  hold still, hold strong.  If you want the truth you’d open an encyclopedia. If you want to be overwhelmed at the innumerable extinctions check out  E  or  S.  My thesis: earnestness is the goal. I’ve read  objective verse  many times over. I know the page is a field of action.  To extend the metaphor: you: the goalie. I imagine you now, reading this alone, with no one else to share the silent joy with. It’s a terrible thing, to be overwhelmed with joy alone. Once on my ring camera I saw Taffy 
finally catch his own tail. He yelped. He doesn’t know that I know, he doesn’t know that I saw. No 
need for this embarrassment. 



________



Log 
My cat is asleep in the closet. It is later, like much later, like I’ve forgotten your birthday, and the month you died: one by choice, the other slowly over time. All the scripts on dog heaven, and their keepers were called  hacks!  and  get the fuck out of here and sell used cars.   Well, not really that intense, more like a lack of reply or  We don’t believe your work is a good match for us right now.  I’ve never watched the film, just love its thesis. The idea that there is no badness, that no furred someone’s have badness in them. This morning a photo of you showed up on my  memories  and I cried. My cat came over and licked my nose. This actually happened, but of course you already know this, of course you looked  down and saw all of this. Although I hope you didn’t. Although, my new thesis is that true joy 
is reaching into the bag of memories and never having to think  I miss you. 



Page Turn Thesis 
The sun bear has enough star fruit to open a planetarium:
so he does. The fruit on the ceiling is meant to look like stars
The planets?  Well that’s us, silly. Sun bears do not yet
have knowledge of other planets, thus, are under the impression 
they are indeed the center; that the sun explodes for them. 
This makes whatever the sun bears do feel important, like pioneers 
of this whole living deal. It's great for a while. A sun bear in Iowa city 
is learning how to preserve star fruits in vinegar, as if this will go on forever. 
It's binary, either the sun bears are alone, or they are not. The answer matters. 
Many sun bears could be employed in a new division of the space program. 
They would spend their days on the logistics of sending a message into space, 
while other sun bears tried to come up with a message. The sun bears would 
become frustrated with the constraints of language. Remember, a sun bear waving 
doesn’t have to mean hello:


there’s a sun bear in birmingham that knows 
about Mars. But, everyone seems really happy and he 
is good at keeping secrets. Today the sun bear is searching 
for land. There’s a marble in his pocket. Since this is a poem 
we get to know this marble is  earth,  and that the bear 
works as a public relations director for the sun bear 
space program. This sun bear knows that visuals are more
effective than words alone: it is difficult to find seven 
square miles of open land. Sun bears keep secrets from 
each other. It’s for the best, we’re told. Yes, from a far enough
distance the sun bear world is small. But, it’s best if we don’t think 
about that.  Just like us: the sun bears come home, and kiss each other. Then, 
back to their possibly fulfilling jobs.All at once this happens on our plant: 
many times over, the sun bears fall asleep.



Counter Argument 
Unlike the poem declared, the rover didn’t say anything at all. 
It’s tender to think she said  I’m cold  because we are weak, and
feel cold too. Sun bears’ loneliness is more of an evolutionary 
gene than emotional one because every atom thinks their type of atom
is best. If we say  sun bears are thinking creatures  here, aren’t you
just a little scared? Yes, we knew the rover would die 
when we sent her to Mars because that’s what batteries do.
Everything has limits. The star fruit tree will become unsturdy 
if it grows too tall. Or, the sunlight will burn the leaves off the tree,
and the tree will start a fire. The sun bears have a finite number of 
star fruits in storage because fruit rots and atoms take up space. 
Come on we’ve been over this already. 
We need to find the sun bear who knows what will happen next.
//
I know I need to get back to the night school where the middle aged sun bears
are learning to code computers, it feels like a useful skill: coding computers. 
Is language important? The bear cub gets fed by pointing to star fruits. The 
father sun bear is miserable because he has responsibilities. He knows many 
words to express this anger, but, can not say them. Appropriate workplace behavior,
you get it. The sun bear gets a new job, buys new things. The job typing ones 
and zeros is slightly less miserable. Eventually it’ll be the future
 because the calendar says so. The sun bear has paws because there were once trees
 in this parking lot. The sun bear has paws because he is a bear and has a natural inclination
to climb trees, but yet: his paws on the tapping away on the keyboard.
The sun bear still wants to paint even though not enough people want to buy his pictures. 
On the weekends when his cubs do not have soccer games he paints.. The sun bear looks forward to this: the weekend. When the bear is happy he does not have to worry 
where his happiness is coming from.



Subjunctive Objects  
What if the sun bear doesn’t go back to school./The 401k will still be matched and there will still/be many loud sun bears on the tv saying that social security is not  a sustainable system ./ A miserable sun bear working a miserable job, or the same bear at a less miserable job. /Don’t patronize me. I’ve done the math. /I know you can’t remove X./ There are rich rock star sun bears everywhere. You’ve heard the songs again, and again. /The sun bear hopes that he does not grow bored too quickly. /He likes new work and meeting new bears,/ doesn't mind reintroducing himself to his boss and across every office building there are strip malls with the same restaurants/. When the waiter asks  if the sun bear will have his  usual / he rushes home and edits his resume. This has been going on for a while now. /He hopes they don’t keep pushing back retirement age. 



Matters of Thinking 
The radio on.
Songs on the radio.
Fuck I’m mad Siken
already said that thing
about  the tree’s roots having to end . 
I wish never read 
that poem. It’s too good. 
Language is everything we need. 
If only the sun bear knew what
to do with his words. The music 
is loud so we don’t have to think.
The sun bear wants to get his visa
 so move back to Malaysia,
so his words have a reason for their nonsense.
There could be a rug
in the trunk. There is something
in the rug. 
Sometimes it’s important
for the bear to be worried.
Otherwise the bank robbers
would always get caught. 
The movies would not 
sell many tickets if the sun bear 
on screen was not miserable. 
If the scene in the horror movie has happy music:
someone please send condolences to the sun bear’s mother.



End note
When I say  they  I don’t mean it derogatorily. I’ll say it again, objectively this time: there are two types of people: those whose childhood dogs died, and those who didn’t have dogs. Today in class I’m lecturing on  The Hero’s journey  I saw something about how at the core of every story is a boy with a dream. I show the montage of Up to remind them of this.  My search history:   dog cloning  It’s not a story of a grumpy old man on an adventure. No, it is about a boy who let time get the best of him. Whose roof leaked one too many times, and had to say goodbye to adventure. Who sold little pieces of joy, and saw the future in each cloud.  Dog Heaven? 



Names

 
Taffy chases the ball. Taffy brings the ball back to we:
the sun bears. Our paws meet, and we throw it again.
Relax. Dogs get to have names. It’s not fair, you know, 
I know, you know. There goes the ball again. But, this time: 
into the forest, and Taffy, well, he goes too. We are getting 
nervous and it is getting dark. Taffy has subpar directional skills
even for a dog. Many things go missing every day. We’ve all seen
the milk cartoons: Taffy is missing, Taffy could be gone. Nothing feels
more important. Because it is not a sitcom: the sun bear must go to work:
hope could be bad, or, Taffy could be living. The sun bear calls the shelter,
makes posts online, and staples posters to telephone poles. The poles 
don’t feel anything, because they do not have fur. Many other sun bears 
have Taffy’s too. These sun bears will empathize with us before saying 
  I’m sorry,  silently they measure the time before we say,  It’s okay. 

 Assumptions 
like: that one stillmoment 
when we fall through the earth.
and. get to the center 
where gravity pushes both ways
all at once.  place  is still. 
places have stillness. time is
not. does not. example: tree roots;
example: everyoctoberleaves. 
we should talk about liminal spaces. like: the future. 
like. how we are almost always there. but. also. 
never have been. like. how  forward  or.  back 
says a lot about age. a lot about you when 
we step into the time machine 
i want to go back to the first day we met. 
i don’t know what i’ll say yet. but. i will 
when i see me seeing you for the very first time again.



Then
given time and magnificent fruit hanging from tootall trees
bewilderment will ensue: we assume. if you have a moment 
we would like to tell our version of human history: lunch provided. 
it starts with a light from an unknown source then its sound.
many times over. until one someone is awoken and thinks 
This always happens at the best part!  and ends in deli turkey. set down 
your day dreams and mistimed night caps; our loans are coming due  


& Then 
the sound the ground and then finally its object. once there was a person 
in cave: shadows assumed. once we fell in love. not with each other but 
with ourselves. once we went to the town with no love poems and 
read them our love poems. we become the kings of joy. we the kings: 
of joy. it’s selfish but we are  Doing good work  eventually they grow tired of 
We  we pack up our things and cut our losses. we go home and take 
jobs at the factory where they cut up the hacked up trees. the press 
secretary says something about  Governmental subsidies  &  Job creation 



A cube who is growing. 

and growing unsure of himself.  
ignoring the possibilities of the subjunctive
here is yesterday. and here is a wall. good day.
the eye can only see. yet  i  needs sight. i am interference:
interference to its description. the selfishness of the ever
loudtomorrow. given these new limitations: yesterday i put
the phone/the calendar/all the books on string theory &
the fact that the big bang underestimates the scale of 
time/gives us a greater sense of importance into a box.
and ignored what will happen to the box. wrote you a letter.
the letter said  i have loved you for a long time now.  


Affirmation Circle 
trust the ring of the clock tower: it’s been right along. 
ignore that one day every four years when we realize we’ve 
gotten so far off track that we say  alright. alright. fine 
one more day of winter.   it’s so easy to get off track. a while 
back someone asked  how would you like to spend the rest 
of your days?   and the boy said  words  meant  look at me! 
meant something about taking the wonder out of all 
the limals spaces like seeing the humming bird’s wings. 
could’ve said  afraid  and something about  the real world
here is a book on the subjectivity of time and 
here is a bird: find truth. create an argument about 
the absolute absence of absolute truth: the many 
truths that are existing right here. and now. all at once:
Jakob, you are in ohio and i am in notohio and all 
the love poems have already had their truth shaken out.



& Then 
here is a box: past tense and dinner plates wrapped in undershirts. 
new walls same body: a story as old as wooden ships. the entirety 
of history started with a flash the size of needle’s head and now: 
today. and now the everpresent promise of tomorrow. here is a 
recorded tragedy and here was the response: social/governed/
and otherwise. history book in a child’s hands. your child’s hands: 
explain you were on the right side without saying  Not everyone 
was like that  &  We, Us  or  Them 



Narration Theory 
a song sang to the sound  One day you could be like me
he sang. in a song. like only he could. in the only 
way he can. 
the goat’s sound sounds like he’s saying baa baa 
baa. the boat in the moat hopefully does not say 
See you later alligator . but instead looks into the eyes
of the paddler and asks  Are you tired? Do you feel fulfilled? 
buckets and rain. leaves and rakes.  Hello fall! 
says the carrot.  I can’t wait to be something more. 
a sound floats in the cave searching for a wall. cave wall. cave sound.
the sound of the object reflected onto the wall. the sound thought 
I’ve been alone for a while now  said  It is Tuesday. You’ve never been afraid. 



Cont.
Are we there yet?  says the child from back seat: always almost. 
Shit that one was so close  says the man at the slot machine. two 
cherries hang side by side on the tree in their togetherlyness 
waiting to be stoned and sconed  they know/they grow. 
the leaves on the trees are dancing in the wind. 
a boy looks down at his floor and thinks  Potential for overwhelming grief. 
a poem gets placed between a poem and another poem. they get all 
coveredup. the poem looks at the poem  You make no sense. You’re all 
nonsense.  the poem looks back at the poem and says  Get the fuck away from me. 
the third in a panic yells  Can you hear me? I already miss you dearly. 



Cont..
the painter sets down their brush.
says  I’ve never felt so far away from language. 
not  says  but thinks it really really loudly. 
the cow makes a cow sound. if the crow crows it’s not a fable. 
the mountain lion lurks in its lover’s shadow.  its  has implications: 
sentience or lack thereof and such.   Such is life  says the seer. 
a dream and a dream go on a blind date.  Tell me about yourself. 
asks the dream politely as he looks into their dreamy eyes. 
I’m just tired of everyone  trying to shake  the meaning out of me. 
a silence. and then some time passes as they sip their 
drinks and talk about a variety of different topics etc. 
I feel woefully misunderstood. 



Abandoned Love Sonnet #X 
we want to locate the origins of sadness: ours. 
we dig through the photo albums. point at the pictures: 
each outcome:  not yet  or  i think we’ve passed it. 
(t)here is a metaphor to show our limitations of language. 
we are sorry for sleeping through the grammar lessons. 
for not knowing which shoes go with our blue suits. and 
shit, sorry we didn’t mean it like that
We know we're doing a bad job of explaining it   or trying to explain 
a song we heard on the radio (somewhere between tucson 
and irvine. before  check engine  but after the last lonely cacti). 
everyone we fell in love with fell in love with us. 



& Then 
because the dishes are not broken we will not apologize for our clumsiness. 
in return: the story of how you me and we almost had to learn the power 
of levitation because the rules say that we must leave our shoes at the 
doorway. we don’t mean this in a disrespectful way. we play games 
at all the dinner parties. sorry for coming to your dinner party. sorry 
for the gray space of acquaintances and workfriends. we just wanted  
to test the limits of  almost 



O 


Dream Postscript 
you are now awake. i am sorry that we have to wake 
here again. the way we have to turn off the water 
so the faucet doesn’t leak all night. how we use the oven 
as a drying rack for the dishes. yesterday i walked by 
three stray cats. each time they ran back into the bushes,
or trees, or away. i mean to say  home.  it’s not terrible 
to forget our dreams. my vision board is tangible: 
a sofa. and. a second trashcan. when the paychecks 
come in i do the math. i want equations without 
problems. i want the answers to be definitive and favorable. 
tonight over the hum of the air conditioner: please 
tell me how hard it is to love me. 



Abandoned Love Sonnet #X
we abandon the ordinary contracts. took a
butterknife to our ponytails. leave the water 
running for our house cats etc.
in a better story after many  Have you heard from Jakob ’s 
we’ll reemerge from the forest remannered with well
formatted resumes.   
a love seat covered
 in oak leaves. your book 
in a used book store.
 and other complicated objects 
a voice over the phone saying 
I’m looking at a photo of us together  


Dear Boat, 
in the absence of an original thought: here is a bird. blue bird 
blue sky. the rain blueing up the river. hello lazy river floater. 
tap water temp beer drinker. weekend longer. we was you. 
us: miss you dearly. 


dear, deer. we sorry. we sorry about the forest forests
forests’ treelessness etc. we measure  away  by the time 
between gentrification and city rejuvenation.


the window is an object for us to see other objects. 
the tall buildings’ testaments to physics as they ignore 
gravity in their sturdiness. the daysun saying  see you later! 
or we can watch the bird  in silence as it makes its sounds. 
we try the  This one trick will make you fall asleep in two minutes 
breathing slowly imagining your body floating away in a canoe 
and it worked.
dreamer and dream scribe. the story begins with a long silent 
stillness. then it is retold. 


unironically someone writes a character based off of we: three years younger 
with a stoner complex. another one has we as the clumsy brother who spilled 
coffee on the CDs. 
you ask me what song was playing at the end of the movie. 
i ask what movie. after a while you say  I found it! 
we listen to a live recording of the concert. one of we says 
I think I can hear me!  and the other we believes we believe it. 


our thesis? got lost in the knowledge. in the emergence of. got lost 
somewhere between  How much longer?  and des moine. we think it had 
to do with science being metaphorical. about how the lab coats 
still need language too. we read an abstract about the big bang. 
it names the unexplainable X as dark matter. defined dark matter by 
saying  It’s kinda like 
what happened and what we remember happening are separate things. 
separate  it s dishes still in the sink. emails in the draft box. and like 
Thinking you’ve been here and done this before   could be true because we know
 it already happened a while back and it did. but also we think it happened
 before that too. 

upon reflection. two considerations. change and the river.
january river april river: change. change flows through
the river. we forgot  there were  we’ve forgotten a lot of things. 
there are two categories of things: what we know 
we’ve forgotten. and things we don’t know we have forgot. 
change is abstract and the river metaphorical. the metaphor:
undefined. not: yet to be. 


without a central object of consideration. of thought. the landscape: fills. the eyeneeded.
object. eye shapes the ground and fills the notground. eye wanted it this way. 
the faint static in the background says  It was never meant to be like this.
we pick back up most of our old habits. intentionally and intensely. 
we want to be certain about the end. not in a philosophic or depressive 
way. more like we’ve seen our future and it seems  just alright. 
we email our old mentor to set up a phone call. the away message 
says something about  a leisure trip  we think. we think  good for him. 
 


the hill flattens. a field: can not be assumed. here is a lot 
for all the cars to wait for their controllers. call it passive income. 
call it a nonzero amount of dollars that are needed to perform the the labor 
for more dollars. it took a while. but.  a new manner of thought. of thinking 
stuck after a few tries we packed our things rerivered our koi fish and said 
let’s get out of here. let’s go.  let’s grow. 
in some nothere: 


two antelopes elope 
elms emulate the last slow dance 
chickadees chirp love songs 


we didn’t hear any of it.  the gallops the rustling 
the winged throat songs. here: we listen to the old songs 
we used to listen to: they so sad: the songs. we were. we begin
to pity our old selfs. selves. sorry. 
at the orchard we pay real dollars to pick real cherries from the trees. 
fake gatherers in the driver's seat. real love on the weekends. 
Happy Friday!  someone signs off an email in the past and 
in the future. in many different places. we label the room 
there  and crown ourselfs the kings of time travel. ,


something else that we can’t get off our minds: the sun whitens our eyes 
and bleaches our irises.
with correct collaboration and false assumptions we land in the past
farmers almanacs and investment prospectuses in hand.  
a really long time passes here. we in the old new world. 
we begin to notice that we feel completely unlike our old selves. 


call back. we calling you back. sorry we missed your call. watching the game. the ref refs refs’ calls 
were bad. we think. we think but know about our bias. we know about the short hand of fan. and we 
like to have things to care about. to talk about with our old friends. hello water. hello water birds. 
__________
birds float in the river
we think duck or geese. 
this is change. change in thinking. 
we feel good. we feel good about it. 
we very happy about the way our thinking has changed. 



After Yesterday 
some  you  or  you ’s asks a question and an  i 
may or may not have an answer: simultaneously: 
sun light. on. night shades. sunlight on the night
shades. sunlight on the nightshades and many 
other seemingly impossible things.
the end of daylight means everything amalgamates.
means there are no answers. the algorithm has no 
answer to  adult nightmares  asks questions like 
reoccuring  &  is/how is it affecting your daily life 
unsatisfying answers like  do not eat before 
&  underlying trauma  someone calls an old
friend and says  I think I used to be in love with you 
not anymore. but a while back. it felt like forever. 

 O 


Abandoned Love Sonnet #X
in our day we knew how to abandon the margin. 
we took our drinks  before  and  after  and held in our 
laugher after the professor said  rework 
you is the you and the page is a trap. now: 
we horses.  bears?  no that was two manuscripts ago. 
the audience for our love poems was singular. 
we sat in dead trees around a wooden table and 
went on and on about the projective verse 
and  who is the   you   
our argument is clear concise and metaphorical:
we are at the page the page is a field we play games 
on the field we need rules to play the game.  


& Then 
another year of digression. we would like to apologize for our transgressions.
how one change changes everything: halfway to past tense and so on. in a few 
decades the telephone pole go the way of payphones: into the white space. right over. 
there. in the city two towns over: the museum that displays murals of men stalking 
a herd of megalodons. the curator says  the icebergs aren’t melting  that it’s a  all part of the 
earth’s natural cycle.  we: in awe of the subjunctive expansion of the phrase 
He expands the skies  the wonder of every undiscovered planet dies. right here. 
we don’t mean to ramble. we came to pay our respects. last summer our dogs
got cancer and we left our ecigarettes charging the car  



Cont… 
a chickadee tweets in the bedtime story another larger bird gets to speak: 
something about the allegory. something to push the narrative forward. 
a mother kisses him on the cheek. in the dream he told you his name. 
over here: a hare. not for long but definitely right now. 
There, there  they say to the sad boy.  Over there  says the 
hunter looking at the deer. the deer looking off 
into the distance. the trees: having to watch it happen 
all over again. 
the wind dances the leaves awake. the leaves shake 
their branches  Come on! Get up already.  says the leaves 
to their branches. 
a tree stares at a pile of mulch 
and then down at her sapling. 
I’m tired of your tricks   says the page to the pencil 
and the lover to the magician. an argument between 
a rabbit and a flock of pigeons. it has to do with 
fame.   Every narrative should end the same  says 
the book on three act structure. some beams 
can only be painted or papered. one of the somethings 
says  There’s only so much I can do. 



Cont…. 
the liminal space and the little rover on mars aren’t 
saying or even thinking  I’m cold  in the silence of  almost 
in the location filled with only the worst kind of hope. 
the liminal space looks at the rover and the rover looks 
at the almostforeverdistance. says  I’m thankful for the lack 
of expression.    For efficient product design, and no logging any overtime. 
as the space fills with  What? ness the rover becomes surrounded 
by the feelings of the state of feelingsesness.  he reaches into 
his pockets exhales and thinks a lot of things 
that he doesn’t know the words for. 



Cont….. 
all the cave paintings have a hero. all the heroes have a spear. 
big furred thumbless beasts. in their story the trees stop growing. 
what then? 
before  In the beginning:  not a long silence. but. a series 
of unobtainable silence. not unobtainable. just inscrutable.
Scribble scrabble dibble dabble  does the animator.
I’ve done a lot of turns 
not  too many  just  many wrong ones.  

an apple surrounded many other apples in the orchard. on trees 
of course. over the course of time the only truth is spring.
the repetition. sprung? sprang?  Back to sleep  says the groundhog. 



& Then 
muscle memory: fingers tippy tapping away. too many id’s too much 
time in dmv lines: all to spend time thinking about commas and 
the right place to pull a sentence part. wishing there were more commas: 
a surprising lack of commas in all the important apps. here is the rare 
coulddoitallover again. this time without the subjective  if . or here 
is an envelope full of enough rent checks to never think about 
the occupation of borrowed space again. here is a photo of a stripmall 
two miles off of the nearest major highway.  prompt: list three places 
where were most certainly can not be



Dear Boat
Postscript: 
you  is a disservice to our kinship. and i’m sorry. i’m sorry for a lot of things: tangible and otherwise. 
in deep july you and i did a lot drugs. we can’t be sure where we got the money. but i know it’s gone. 
going back to when you came to   Where did everyone go   i wasn’t sure what you meant. 
[this space represents the three earth minutes where (as you sat hunched over nodding off and more offer) you fell in love and moved to tacoma. where you invented a new way 
to clone our house pets without the limitations of material science. where you made a lot 
of money and responded to most emails with  fuck you. ] 
then we trade places. i take your work shirt and come home to walk the dog at noon. you: slowly over time take longer to text back. then eventually: not at all.
______________________________________________________________________________


all the love poems are stagnant: all the love without verb. 
i know enough to know i don't know much. all the expressions need to be languaged. all the language needs an object or objects to pass through. someone who looks at us probably thinks 
who the fuck are they talking too
which has nothing to do with any of this but sounds nice. our cat runs into the kitchen at the 
sound of his favorite sounds. i listen to the same podcast for the third time this week: half chuckling 
at the parts i remember being funny. 
moonlight through the gin bottle: said this a while ago but wasn’t sure you heard. you is very far away. all the you’s are very far away. said this too much already too. my concerns are limited and 
ever present. this morning i opened my window and my cat heard a bird chirp for the very first time. 
T. C.  is translating a high school history book that he found outside our old school. well not translating but putting the syntex into present tense. he says it’s rather intense. every night for 
the last two months he texts me  it’s happening again! 
somewhere between your hometown and indianapolis we stop and take a picture next to the world’s largest robin’s nest. the eggs are small blue and normative. i said i love you. and you said that same phrase too. 
we name the boat tuesday. your iris is the lake. 


, 
Hope is an island, but for now I’m surrounded by love.  

way back when the little poem boys went town to town reciting their version of the story. i imagine 
some were more interesting than others. i imagine odysseus didn’t always return content. there was probably a few of them who got really nervous and stumbled on the line breaks. the emperors probably sent them home rather quickly. lucky little poem boys. 
i caught myself typing  visiting  and not  coming back 
i dictate my favorite poem and email it to T.C.. which is more of a trust exercise than anything else. 
we have a long conversation about where we want to eat. 
he says something about having to request time off work or dipping out early. i say something about 
getting a better job. he says  don’t worry i’ll pay. 


	,
How does one get unstuck from metaphor? What does it do to the body, to the self, to myself when every expression needs an object to the speakering.
water gets ungrounded
and fills the vase.
debuckets and
waters the nightshades.etc. 
  

i had three dreams. one where instead of copy pasting the phone number i called it. one where we lost our shoes and when we went back they were chasing us. the third i don’t remember but i’m sure happened. 
i had three more dreams. one where i failed a night class on horology. and another where a blue bird spoke perfect latin. 
in another dream three boys got in trouble for talking in class. one got sent home. another got placed in different classroom. and the third had to stay. right. there.  

	,



	In retrospect I realized I never defined you. You are location, you are the  here : tall sail wind catcher, long moon admirer, unstable internet provider, an excuse for coming or not coming to your dinner party. 
	There’s a dead language somewhere that has a word for the space between no, I’m sorry, but thanks anyway. 


someone i know really well is in school to become psychologist. after class we do role plays. not 
in a sexual way more like: after a really long series of follow up questions and silences i come to realize that back in elementary school i wasn’t  rushing through his work trying to be first  but more like  panic!
someone else i used to know really well texts  I’ll be in town this weekend we should get drinks  after a few days pass. i text back “that probably isn’t a good idea”.  

, 


	It’s tomorrow again. It’s Tuesday, it’s you day. I’ve forgotten what led me to you.
over: nothere: a river. and at the river many things are probably happening. the things: a song. a song without its sounds: a poem. i’ve forgotten the word for this kind of logic, and forgotten what to do with the flares. a better me would know what to do with the flares. Maybe not  do with the  but  when . Not enough considerations on time. All our thinking about time has come at the wrong time. 

four numbers i didn’t have saved in my phone text  Happy Birthday! 
[i imagine a really long time passes here.] 
, 



	I’ve forgotten what I’ve said to you, and what I thought about wanting to say to you. 


, 


Do you see the dot, or dots on the shore line too? 
one man takes a cigarette out of his pocket and places it in the mouth of another. 
he lights it. a flame next to lips. then smoke. then smoking. it doesn’t feel romantic. 
but there’s love. 	right 	over 	there.		damn. 


it's’ comforting to think there is no new knowledge and actually believe it. i’ve read everything on 
my bookshelf two times over, and after a lot of  final notices  they took away my library card. 
the core of this story is about friendship. or lack thereof. how devastating it feels to end a text with an old friend and end with  I hope you’ve been doing well. 
but also and inarguably so at the core of every story there are two people talking or not talking.  we get them in the car so they can talk. we put up a road block (road kill detour through the back roads. spring geese following their leader to the pond etc. etc. it doesn’t really matter) to see what they’ll say.
different story. same argument:
we fell in love. her name was june. 


landscape is orientation. landscaping is a sign of a good day job. 
dreamscape is the space between yesterday and tomorrow.  

, 


	I threw the “Welcome Home”  sign in the lake. Which is not an apology but an acknowledgement. Which is to say that I know this is home now, but don’t want to say it out loud. I mean it’s taken me a really long time to realize I’ve been dreaming in third person. A man who I should know really well said,  The Body is a trap,  took my hand and said,  Language is a necessary evil,  ran a butterknife along my chin hairs,  It’s shameful to feel anything but joy. 



& Then 
our wages: hourly: paid not in effort or labor but in the value of being   present 
in attempt to ignore the empty glass: the glass fills up with itself. the language 
of dreams always continues with  and then/  is   described in unreachable tangible objects/
or ends with  job.  the time between clocking out and melatonin is ours



& Then 
in the hardware store: an aisle of natural light. we trade four hours
of labor for five small chunks of simulated sunlight to hang  above 
the unlucky trees in our dining room. hedging our bets: we go to 
the forest and offer our best offerings. we tie our legs to the midsections 
at the christmas tree farms as we scream the phrase printed on our shirts 
Evergreens should live forever!  an article in the new york post reads 
These leftists think trees have feelings  the wsj  The latest in small business guerilla marketing 



Abandoned Love Sonnet #X
you or i takes the other by the hoove. it’s a rather lovely 
feeling: trust. we can only trust so many things.  black hole 
a reminder that we can’t trust the atoms and their congregation. 
we are waiting for the boot to fall. this time is does. and we 
fall in love with the wrong  you.  that's how our favorite poem went. 
of course we remember it word for word. email us if you know that 
poem word for word. or clap twice if you can remember what color 
shoes you wore the first time you heard your favorite song.  
we are sorry for coming or not coming to your dinner party. it sounds 
cliche but in deep july we did some drugs and  never really came back 
then: the landscape repeopled as the trees held their tongues. 
it was tuesday. again. but that’s probably not important. 
what is important  the horse asks. 



& Then 
it’s not true but it actually happened. incongruity of the body. 
in the body: the right hand curled up waiting for the left to respond. 
here is a research paper on x or y: it minimizes the self: seeing 
thousands of selves dotted on the graph. as gravity ignores 
our questions and ethics an object moves even between blinks. 
we didn’t know our old middle school could go out of business 
until we ates soft pretzels and sugared smoothies from the food court 



& Then 
we come to your doorstep and we want to be clear: we mean this with the utmost disrespect
our backstory is unremarkable but clear: we walked five miles to renew our drivers license.
we got our usual sandwich from a different location and over the rush of yellow to red: the myth 
of orange: we admitted to ourselves that  We are going to be here for awhile longer  in the darkness 
the lantern becomes structural. we: the king of moths. many eyes dart towards our hands. 
now with this attention: we: the populators of fly over country would like to remind you 
that there is no  here  and  there  just more distance between strip malls and nonprofits 


O 


Abandoned Love Sonnet #X
we would like to thank you for coming. thank you for
your time. we are sorry that we could not accommodate 
all the dietary restrictions. we don’t mean to be inconsiderate. 
here is a sad equation coming to life. 
the river and the light and we are sorry. we apologize 
for the lack of object. we know we need the objects. 
we know our voice is followed by other voices 
could you repeat that please 
we know about past tense. that the quarters didn’t 
come out from our ears. and that the farm up north 
is a myth. but we can’t hear you. we: saving up for 
laundry day. 
once for nearly two years who only spoke in gratitude 
and apologies. this actually happened. not to say the rest 
of all of this did not. but we just want to remind you that 
there are no  committees  or  departments  just people wearing 
different hats in meetings and  checking to see if an e signature will suffice 



Abandoned Love Sonnet #X
Damn. we’ve lost it. how does it go
again. the river: the light: then winter.
still river: still winter. over there:  dream 
here:  imagination  you: the space inbetween. 
and on the island we were horses. unbridled and 
No that was two poems ago.  to define  we  we hold 
hands. count clovers. two lucky clovers: two 
love sick horses running in the mayfields. then 
it was tuesday: eventually it wasn’t. 
any moveable object such as a cloud. or its insides 
or you and i is a terrible place to put trust into. 
 time is kind. says  heart attack : not 		. 
describes the man as  complicated.  reminder: 
in lieu of flowers send donations to 



Dear Boat
not  we woke  up and it was all a dream. but  we took the goggles off and represented ourselves. 
not  in august we  get clean  but  in august we run out of birthday checks and have to remanner ourselves. 
now less than ever: the mannering. man we miss july. we miss the collapse of time. we thankful for this: the missing. the absence marks something we delighted in. the something: we’d rather not talk about that.
privacy is a privilege. like  splitting rent checks or man we wish we didn’t publish that one but you know cv/job market/etc.  

a thing and a thing walk float or drag each other into the water or forest  after some time 
things emerge. no follow ups please. we just passing it on. just telling you what we heard. 
a number we have saved as only by their utility to us texts  Holiday Specials! 
a.j texts we to see when we’ll be in town again. we text back  man i think we were in love.  

trees but nottrees but not nottrees wave. it wasn’t windy. there was no wind. we sure. we very sure 
about this stillness. 
we got fat on replacement things. we picked back up our hack on another. we read an article about someone like we who became a marathon runner and fell in love. 
we missed  knot  but don’t feel bad about it. although the ambivalence is terrifying in its own right. 


not  we the people. just we  the person(s).
it was dark as not to wake the neighbors some song hums
near silently on we’s phone speaker.
we said kiss us here here and here.
lips on skin 
darkness in the mouthspaces 
shadows dance in the night 
light passes and passes through. 
we reject our old thesis on love. we  just reaching out to see 
if our love thesis could be redacted from the transcripts.  

all hail the joy boys.
we  the boys of july.
 a few winters ago we got thin on long walks
 and intermittence.  we wouldn’t describe
it   fondly  but we remember it well.
in the allegory of the well there is a bucket and a boy. the boy goes to the well 
and brings back the bucket. full. we don’t remember it well. we can admit we 
don’t remember much. it doesn’t feel relieving to say this out loud. we’ve known it all allalong. 

a notwe asks: why  july . why  we  


traditionally you  a receiver  just a. 
alon e is a decision we aren’t ready to make. a while back we took we by the hand. 
we were holding hands and said  Let’s get out of here   said  we’ll be back before you know it. 
no we didn’t know it. what is or is not known. two boxes for this categorization. call it 
considerations  call it  something to think about 
our changing is small gradually and mostly unrealzied. to leave a space for follow ups we say 
let me know if there are any questions. 


the time. the  some time passes  we haven’t talked about that. we’ve been meaning to. earnestly. 
our steps are not approaching. but elliptic and liminal  just passing through  the space between 
expression and  what is the narrative situation.
passing through the mountains: static over the phone or the limitations of batteries. 
what happened to solar science. or the gravity ignoring locomotives. we kiss we’s neck 
we say  not tonight. 
love stuck in the radio. waves pass but not through. a photo of someone we love lost between 
the cloud and the object thiefing our sleep.  

we forgot the point. 
we forgot to point.
is this the island. 
is we the island.
the song says we’ve been
the island all along.
